Truth be told… I ……..I…. can dish it out but sometimes I .........have to work HARD at taking it. Im not an advocate of armchair warfare its just…. I sometimes can’t seem to practice what I preach. So trust me ……this lesson is for me dude.
More often than in the past this is a tradition that is being skipped.
When you look at the modern era of sprinting – going back to the 1960’s – the vast majority of our Super Sprinters have been developed by top coaches coaching multiple talented athletes – a combination of technical expertise joining with a fierce training environment.
"Guess what, mate," says the first IT guy,
WHAT: Spectrum Fantastic Art Live! is a natural extension of the eighteen-year success of the award-winning Spectrum art annual. As an international melting pot of talent, Spectrum: The Best In Contemporary Fantastic Art has come to symbolize the vibrancy, diversity, and overall excellence of the creative community.
as my blog hopefully grows and i fine-tune it’s purpose, i’d love for you to be a part of it!
cause those who love winter,
9This man was giving ear to the preaching of Paul, who, looking at him, and seeing that he had faith to be made well,
According to his new official website, J-Dilla.com, the late and very great Detroit production wizard we all knew as Dilla, Jay Dee or James Yancey will now have a new and very admirable non-profit foundation in his name and the administration of his estate has been appointed to West Coast probate attorney Alex Borden, who took over for former estate executor Arthur Erk in April.
#1: Trust. It is the choice to believe that what the Lord says He will do, He will indeed do. It is, in truth, a declaration of the Lords character. Am I standing with Him, trusting; or am I against Him, worrying and second-guessing?
4) my adrenal fatigue improves
To make it worse, it really looks as if Zuma did all he was supposed to do. He went to the national executive committee and said, “Look, let’s draw a line here”. They agreed. Malema then crossed it. And Zuma acted, supposedly with the mandate and full might of the NEC behind him. And now he’s seriously considering dropping any charges against Malema.
Jennifer and Marsh are a couple that are FUN personified. Bright, cheery, crazy in love fun. No surprise, then, that their wedding was a fun-filled day that even a sudden rainstorm couldn’t dampen (the tent for the ceremony was great wedding insurance!! Having a wedding in May in a rainforest, you have to have weather back up).
Summer here at Long Creek Herbs means daylilies and we have several colors. Here's one of the orange doubles...
Please note that this is an informal briefing, and participants will be available for extended questions and discussions with the media. Lunch will be provided.
It is your belief, and yours alone, that gives you the impetus to achieve any level of financial abundance you desire. Don’t get lost in numbers, but instead focus on the abundance of abundance itself. Believe in yourself and your Higher Consciousness that is always at work within you.
I frosted ten of the mini cupcakes with chocolate buttercream. I put chocolate jimmies (my favorite sprinkle in the WHOLE world) and Valentine nonpareils in two separate plates. Then I rolled the edges of the frosted cupcakes in the sprinkles and set them aside.
The Good: Babymouse has some of the best daydreams, ever.
Ohhhhh I can feel the snow coming so I decided it was time to put together a few snowflake digital die cut files for you folks out there that have cutting machines and the software! This week I have relased a set of three snowflake files (as well as each file individually).
The Mouse will invade and pervade every crevice and hidden alcove. He will settle in and nest just beneath your range of vision. You’ll see the signs of his presence, and maybe you’ll think he’s just passing through, that he’s not inclined to stay. But you’d only be denying the Truth.
- A third secret services account claim form, dated 31 January 2011, on which Naidoo requested R67 696.55 “to purchase building materials and hardware . . . to carry out security upgrades at the residence of the minister of police”, approved by Lazarus.
Didn't your momma ever tell you that you can be whatever you want to be? If you want to go grain free, you can do it!
"No one knows what it means, but it's provocative. Gets the people goin'!" (Will Farrell in Blades of Glory)
In part one of this series (over at Kidlit Celebrates Women’s History Month), I wrote about women in science who boldly went where no women had gone before. Today I want to continue this series by looking at 20th century women and their contributions to science.
Proprioceptive Exercises “…What in the bloody hell are those?” Good thing you asked, watch this video real quick and we’ll catch up with you in a minute…
Anyway, here's some Bill Nye. I'm going to play some Minecraft not that I'm calm and have check my house for structural damage.
Enter Nancy of The Dogs Eat the Crumbs and the Nancy pan. Nancy was on the West coast and we arranged to meet up. In an opportune twist, Nancy hadn't baked these brownies yet, and neither had I, so she came to the house and we made them together.
WE think they are a pretty family.
“Oh, I see.” CHECK PLEASE!
Theron at first offered a 2010 South Africa trip - complete with World Cup tickets, a safari trip and a chance to meet Nelson Mandela.
The comments can be read by clicking here, and hope I am not misquoting anyone, however, as I read it the arguments were widely as follows:
G’Literring Fruits
What’s your style? Jenny started out hoping to play electric guitar, so she could pursue Rock music, but in a short time she fell in love with Acoustic guitar! She made the realization that with her softer-toned voice, acoustic just fit her better! It also allowed her to try and include elements of folk songs into her music. Jenny comments, “To sum it up, I am an acoustic folk singer songwriter.”
This week I'm on Spring Break and I'll be catching up on two major homework assignments that will be due next week, as well as trying to figure out new ways to promote the book drive.
In December 2011, Romney told supporters in New Hampshire about his time in France, which he described as “not exactly a Third World country” but adding that “most of the apartments I lived in had no refrigerators”. Was it his Place du Marcaillou residence which he recalled when talking about the “little pads on the ground” he would use in the absence of a working lavatory, adding that “there was a chain behind you with a bucket”?
Also, I cannot control other people’s tongues. I must choose wisely what I allow myself, or my family to listen to. I must also remember to not continue gossip or negative talk.
With аll оther aspects іn place, the final piece to the puzzle rests in you. With Halloween bеcоming а lіttlе lеѕѕ horror and а lot mоre hot, yоu havе an opportunity to bе а little more flirtatious or out-going than уоu uѕuаlly might be. Take advantage of thіѕ free pass to fun and reallу tаkе оn the character аnd incorporate а lіttle of your оwn sexiness and attitude іnto уour costume.
This is a big day for the church. This is a big day for Christianity, or at least, it should be. Not just because it’s another event on our liturgical calendars that we can cross off. Not because it’s the 1st pre-curser to Easter (if you don’t celebrate Ash Wednesday). And not because the cute little kids wave palm branches around and yell: “Hosanna.”
Not really being that big a fan of risk-taking without allowing myself an out, and definitely being an over-achiever, I set out in January to find my happiness and define my new vision while still holding down the fort (full-time job, mom of the year, serving in two ministry teams at my church, being the friend to others that I want and need to have myself, multiple Bible studies and small groups). What I think I've worked myself into is a new shade of crazy, with matching earrings. I'm sure as my friends and family, you've seen several shades of crazy on me, but this one... it's special. You would think I learned after ending up in the hospital last October, not to burn my candle at both ends, but I guess it's hard to break old habits. Anyway, I'm not sure that this crazy is a bad crazy - only time will tell.
As May turned to December and Mandela made way for whoever, I would sometimes bump into the anti-Apartheid scarf-wearers of my college days and ask them how they thought the new South Africa was getting on. This sobering but far from sober experience helped to formulate the No Good Boyo Iron Rules of Student Politics, applicable to all causes:
If you mentioned the name Ellie Goulding one year ago many would not have known her name – but as she headed to Reading’s Hexagon Theatre last Friday for the final night of her UK tour, the intimate venue was filled with people of all ages, waiting to hear the voice of Christmas 2010.
Here’s to all the women who struggle with their body image and do they best they can to be happy with themselves. I know your struggle, I feel your pain, and I wish us all the best of luck in learning to love our bodies.
Now I can't show you all of the pages because I really hope you will go to her blog and show her some love.
Waitrose managing director Mark Price said: “The tough economic climate is putting pressure on everyone, so this is excellent news for customers.
General Contractor: Becker General Contractors
from the couch to a toy...
NES – 50$ (70CAD) at the time
So this morning, that is exactly what I did. I got up at 6:15am… drank a cup of coffee… ate some breakfast… stretched and then hit the pavement and ran/jogged/walked around the neighborhood twice. I’m sure I didn’t go even a mile but I feel better than I have been in a long time! Sometimes that is all it takes.
As far as I can see…I am perfectly happy!! ^_^ I know who I am! I know the meaning of Socratic Irony. I know what I want and I know exactly how to get it!!
Saturday after the shower, Cam and I were originally planning on relaxing and getting more stuff done around the house. However, those plans changed earlier this week when I found out that my grandma, aunt, and cousin would be flying from Michigan out to California. My sweet grandma is 84 years old and her sister, Dot, who lives in the Bay Area is 86 and they are still super close and talk every single day, however, they hadn't been to visit each other in a few years. Last week, Dot's health started rapidly declining and it looked like if my grandma wanted to see her one last time, she needed to get out to California ASAP. So my grandma (accompanied by my Aunt Harriet and my cousin Michael) ended up flying out on Thursday afternoon. I wasn't there on Thursday to see when my grandma and her sister were reunited, but everyone who was there said it was really touching and emotional when they saw each other for the first time after so many years of being apart. Thankfully, Dot's health has significantly improved since their arrival and it looks like she's actually going to be getting out fo the hospital this week! I think that seeing my grandma has really lifted Dot's spirits, and they are both amazing ladies. (And despite the fact that my grandma has spent most of her life in Michigan and Dot in California, having grown up in Georgia, they are still both so Southern through and through!)
We were in a pasture flanked by woods on two sides, and the trees were blowing around so fiercely that they were bending and creaking. I started imagining the worst, and I closed my eyes and said a prayer while Nate worked frantically. He finally finished, and the broilers seemed stable. It was well after 10 o’clock when we accepted that we had done all we could and there was nothing more to do but wait
Many Governor’s Mansions throughout the US have had the same problem: they have lots of rooms full of artifacts and antiques, all done up for formal entertaining, but precious little room for the Governor and his family to actually live in. You know, you can’t really sit in a formal parlor in your underwear, watching “The View” and eating peanut M&Ms, if you know that at 10am some docent in a hoop skirt is going to be bringing a tour group of little old ladies through who are hellbent on seeing Mrs. Beauford Jester’s china pattern.
Group breaks are a lot of fun. I always go for the Rangers if they're available and many group breaks will give you a random team as well. I drew the Brewers as my random team in one of Nachos Grande's recent breaks. That's not a bad thing as I can easily trade away the Brewers I pulled.
This gown is absolutely stunning, almost angelic. The perfect way to end the tour.
You see, I have a new job. A dream job. I am going to be heading up the new imprint from Angry Robot - STRANGE CHEMISTRY. I am taking my place as editor of Strange Chemistry (sister imprint of ANGRY ROBOT BOOKS), and will be bringing you the best in YA books in the future.
Spaten-Franziskaner-Bräu GmbH
The stage in the first act is a dry earth. Water running through the cracks is life but that water is polluted and that's why the water turns into blood, making unbearable pain to Amfortas.
By: Rachel Hauck
It was two years ago this past Monday that we arrived in London to stay indefinitely. Wow, did that go quickly. The photo above was taken in May 2010 in our old kitchen, in our first apartment after corporate housing - the house we were basically evicted from. You can read that rotten tale here.
Slightly more than a year ago, I decided to change my life.
My my most recent attempt at wrestling control back from the TV was to move it from the loungeroom to the study where I could close door on it and hopefully it would be a case of out of site out of mind. It worked really well for a few months. Iris slowly watched less and less TV and she even went a few weeks without watching any at all. Then we got sick, the weather turned crappy and the TV crept back into our lives.
Another washout of a day, so my Nikon went unused. I, like many others in the UK are fed up with this rain everyday. In an ideal world, it would only rain during the night, and there would be some good sunshine during the day.
A battered Tripeo scrambles up to Art and embraces
Step 5: Depose your hard earned 8€ at the bank.
With technology this community is now worldwide and open all hours, but has opened its doors and to people who will ultimately profit from making its members poorer and miserable. Frankly it feels like a betrayal.
Upon completion of the journals he comes face-to-face the reality that Stefan is the vampire priest and the real reason he has been asked to read the journals. The priest wants William to kill him, and he believes William needs to live through the gamut of the priest’s emotions.
In the episode, the world (including our characters at the time of Silencio Lake, Utah) is in an alternative timeline universe where all of history is happening at the same time, 5:02 to be exact, (because he didn’t die when he was supposed to, thanks to River). Then we find out that its okay, she can shoot him at the lake, because he won’t really be dead. He reveals to River that his body is really a fake body, with the tiny shrunken real Doctor driving it. Basically, he’s hiding. So, they get married (still not sure why, as far as plot drive, but I like that they are married), kiss, and time goes back right, leaving us at the moment of his death on Lake Silencio. River shoots him, he “dies” and they burn his body. The fake Doctor body got “dead” and then his tiny little self crawled out of the dead body, off a burning boat in the middle of a lake, then he somehow got back to his normal size again.
Schrader SM. Reproductive toxicology of male workers. Presented at Reproductive Endocrine Conference, Bethesda Fertility Center, Cincinnati, Ohio. August 26, 1987.
Day 3: Something You Adore
The movie kicks off strongly and initially looks like it’s going to play out like a noir picture. A car is making its way along a stretch of road in Tunisia in the middle of a violent storm. The rain is hammering down relentlessly and the darkness is closed in oppressively on all sides with only the headlights cutting a feeble path ahead. Hunched in the gloom, the driver squints through the rain-streaked windscreen and forges on. By sheer luck he avoids running slap into a landslide that’s taken out the road. As he gets out to try to discover a way round the obstruction, he comes upon a wrecked and abandoned truck. His good fortune in avoiding an accident is revealed to be one of those sneaky tricks of fate when he finds that the truck was apparently part of a gun running operation. This whole sequence takes place without a word of dialogue and the murkiness of a rotten night is only broken by the occasional flashes of lightning that draw attention to the important sights. That wonderful atmosphere is retained as the tired and muddy traveller makes his way to the nearest town, and the welcoming light of the local inn. It’s here that we learn his identity: David Redfern (Trevor Howard), a British archaeologist sent to catalogue and collect some ancient artifacts (including the golden salamander of the title) before overseeing their shipping. His close call on the washed out road has placed him in a perilous position though, with the gun runners suspecting (though at first not sure) that he’s seen something. What draws him deeper into danger is his becoming romantically involved with the young proprietress of the inn, Anna (Anouk Aimee), whose brother is part of the smuggling gang. The plot is a straight thriller that sees Redfern first wrestling with indecision before resolving to take action when a tragic turn of events forces his hand. Even then he has to face up to the fact that the town is a nest of corruption where it’s impossible to be sure who, if anyone, can be trusted.
Happiness is a choice not an option!
CK Free for Men is a single word to say what you prefer is a brand name of clothing that was marketed throughout the calvin klein dri a wide variety of options so that there is no surprise that his designs and dresses appeal to more than one age group, which is commonly known as FIT, one of those perfumes that would make huge success with the calvin klein catalog. Another international trend of the most feminine contour you could lavishly use on your body. Buying underwear is the supremely chic Calvin Klein popular and successful.
The EPA is requiring all consumer rodenticide bait products to be sold only with bait stations. Loose bait such as pellets will be prohibited, and there will be new restrictions on the active ingredients in the bait. The new standards also affect rodenticides used by professional applicators and for agricultural purposes.
I had spent so much time reaserching and deciphering how to build a dyanmic website from scratch that I forgot about recording my research and findings by being complete absorbed in the intricacies of MySQL and PHP. To make things even more difficult I did want to explore all the possibilities of CSS rather than using templates, feeling free in the playground; finding on the way all sort of code oddities as for instance the fact that Firefox don’t display iframes referenced by an ‘id’ tag –unlike Safari and Opera–.
If my math is correct, this is the second consecutive Memorial Day that the President has decided to honor the war dead of another. A second time he has found himself too busy to be at Arlington National Cemetery.
Then work back along your path to where you are today, writing down all of the milestones that you need to pass in between.
From award-winning playwright, Layeta Bucoy:
It's been 1 full year since you were born. I don't remember what life was like before you. Having you here now makes everything seem complete, and the happiness you have shown me in the last 12 months seems unreal.
Best – Join a crit group. Your writing will improve in leaps and bounds once you do, and you’ll learn how to take and receive constructive criticism. There’s nothing better for any writer.
Chris Powling confided early on that he believed she was a fairy. She certainly knew how to enchant. I used to take my three daughters to some of these parties and she was unfailingly kind to them and genuinely interested in them. She heartily approved of the fact that we were all vegetarians (this is no longer true of the youngest) and I could not get her to read Peter Dickinson's The Dancing Bear, which I thought was his best book, because she would not even consider a story which touched, even sympathetically, on any harm to animals.
Keeping the lines of communication with God open will help eliminate misunderstandings before they happen. The Holy Spirit really is our attitude regulator. As long as we keep our hearts in tune, we won’t unknowingly override His gentle promptings. O LORD, do good to those who are good, whose hearts are in tune with you. Psalm 125:4 (NLT) Misunderstandings often occur when we are too busy to pay full attention to what’s being said. The stress and tension that miscommunication can create may put a strain on even the strongest relationships. When you are feeling overwhelmed or agitated from the daily demands of your responsibilities, take a quick moment of reflection before engaging in a conversation you expect may be frustrating. By reflecting on God’s Word, you will be better prepared to resist the temptation to “jump to conclusions.” Don’t allow your day to be hijacked by a would-be joy robber, when God has given you the mind of Christ. The minute you start to feel your peace slip away, take a minute to ask the Holy Spirit to help you pull yourself together. Don’t wait until you’ve responded inappropriately before you consider correcting your disposition.
to change, to morph, to be
"Stay a child while you can be a child."
You all know Heaven's Walk as looking like this
In a small act of defiance and self-indulgence, I closed an e-mail this morning with that phrase...addressed to him to whom I once said it in a grandiose gesture of farewell and heartbreak. George Lucas put it another way, voiced by Yoda: "Do or do not, there is no 'try'."
Visit Wilma's blog so you can see more pictures of her in her beautiful sunflower collar made by Linden Line Designs, read about what it's like to be a winner, and find out what her winning caption contest entry was!
One of the biggest attractions for the New Year festivities is the “Temple Fair”, called in Chinese 庙会, pronounced “Miao Hui”. Temple Fairs are usually held in the parks surrounding the various temples of Beijing and are host to performances such as the dragon and lion dances, waist drum dancing, lotus blossom fairy dances and various other folk performances. Here families can play games, win toys for the youngest family members and eat the most traditional foods. One of the biggest Fairs is in Ditan Park, one of the most popular temple fairs since 1985. Temple fairs in Beijing date back to around 1000AD, the tradition began as groups of vendors gathered around temples when many pilgrims came to pay tribute to the gods during the festivities. As the practice grew, and it turned into regular events, it gradually become every New Year’s Temple Fairs.
She would also like to know where her pursuers are. She wishes that she would be able to use one of her psionic abilities to detect them, but she isn’t powerful enough to do so. They are too far away. Not even Crow would be able to detect them psionically. It’s just how psionic abilities work. Entertainment venues such as movies, television, and comics have glorified psionics, making them out to be more powerful than they really are. Reality is a different story, even though Shannon wishes otherwise right about now.
and I'll fall off them without any straps
Peter @ Stellar Cafe because he is an AMAZING author/illustrator and great friend! One of my biggest CHEERLEADERS (only he doesn't wear a skirt! LOL!)! Dawn @ Because I Said So because she is an AMAZING friend and another of my biggest CHEERLEADERS (and she's dang cute in a skirt!) and...and...and...she received her BOOK in the mail yesterday and has been giggling ever since!! Go over and check her out...pre-order your book! It's gonna be a GOOD ONE!!!
Why are you online? Who's your audience?
by Julian of Norwich
Spencer had to go to work, so Preston and I spent the day getting ready for the events that evening. I tried to make it seem like we didn’t really have anything planned. In the morning I casually asked Spencer, “So, you said you wanted to go to the Cheesecake factory for dinner. What else do you want to do tonight?” Spencer just said he wanted to be with us, his family. Aww, what a good guy! Little did he know I had a very fun surprise party waiting for him after dinner, mawahahaha.
If the younger woman is a writer, she eventually writes something about the older woman.
Aria
Second, good digital cameras and SLR film cameras with Program modes permit you to shift the program. What this means is that the Program mode might meter a scene and recommend a value pair like f/5.6 at 1/500″. Shifting the program generally uses one of the command wheels — rolling it one way increases the f/stop step by step until its limit, while rolling it the other way decreases it commensurately. The shutter speeds recalculate appropriately. This permits you to be creative “on the fly” by letting you choose the best shutter speed for the subject or depth-of-field for the subject without moving out of Program mode! Read your camera’s manual for specifics of this very spiffy and important feature (see my article Spend time with you camera’s manual for some pointers on the importance of refreshing your memory occasionally).
thank her for the patience, the understanding
- One year ago tomorrow we were on our way to Orlando for 12 days of kid-free bliss. It was a spectacular trip and look back at those memories every day very fondly. This trip was a way for My Dear Nathan and I to connect again after a very long year of him working out of town.
Pray, Adopt, Advocate, Support...Do Something!
For the stomps......
After no little aliens came back, I had the mother alien look and look, and then she was sad. Then, she said “hep, hep, hep” and all five little aliens came back!
The latter unfortunate incident happened while I still had doors on my house with key-lock deadbolts.
She need not have felt badly, and I told her so. I can't believe she thought to bring the book here all the way from Texas! My husband and I just the day before had been discussing that there were probably hundreds of piano books with my name in the upper right hand corner (meaning they are from my "lending" piano book library) out there in various homes!!! I write them off on taxes (I need the tax write-off!!) and so when they are returned they are a BONUS!
Author: Joanne Fluke
dictate that you must have a minimum of one irreplaceable member/extremely important person (Don Brewer does not qualify- even though he wrote and sang their biggest hit, and is definitely an important component to the band, he's not THE guy; plus, he’s a drummer) and (with rare exceptions) one original deputy/up-there-but-not-essential member (Brewer does qualify for this, as does bassist Mel Schacher.) If Brewer left and Farner returned, we'd have us a Grand Funk Railroad. If Brewer and Schacher remain, AND Craig Frost returns, AND Mark Farner's son joins on guitar and vocal, it's still not Grand Funk Railroad (see Blue Oyster Cult for evidence of how this is supposed to work.)
Also, part of the charm, but I’ve been known to have a good time in a plastic shell with lino on the floor, Chris Tarrant's voice asking questions from quiz machines and 60 inch flat screen TVs blaring out Formula 1 noises and Beyonce noises just metres from my aural canals.
“No,” he said, pulling on his trousers. “Just green light. And mud. Like going to Mars. You know, how they used to think there were canals and all that and now they think there’s probably nothing there?”
I thought about just bunching one up the other day and making it look folded. Then I did it and realise I think I do a better job when I actually attempt to fold it because then it doesn’t crinkle so much. I don’t know if I do it right but I think I’ve mastered it alright as I’ve got older, I’m no Martha Stewart but I haven’t seen her teaching me how to do that shit right!
- advocates legal and regulatory reform at national and international levels
Oh now, meet me in the middle of the day
Sailing away for the first time to the land where the legend of the "River Styx" flowed in classical mythology...Athens, the most powerful of the ancient Greek City States, is the birth place of western civilization. I haven't gone "Greek" since my Alpha Tau Omega frat days at Murray State University in the late 70's.
I think a part of it was the fact that I didn’t notice the pens were useless because most of my writing is now done on the computer. But there’s something to be said for holding a pen and writing on a nice, clean sheet of paper. It’s a tactile sensation like no other. The pen is mightier than the sword may well be cliché but oh, how true it is.
I believe in children ministry and that our kids are going to play a vital role in the future of revival in Virginia! My passion is to see this ministry grow in every church in our state. I may not be able to travel to every church, but I am available to help you in several other ways: video conferencing, conference calls, and resource materials to help you transform your children’s ministry!
Aspirin is also available in combination with other medications such as antacids, pain relievers, and cough and cold medications.
Book Description:
The world is quiet and the pig is in the sty.
The weekend is dominated by several Cymbelines and plenty of Cinema: English teacher Diana Walsgrove’s production at Havant is seen by a number of students on Friday and Saturday, some of whom are at the Shakespeare Society’s reading of the play at my house on Sunday. Sunday evening and anyone who’s anyone is in the Lupton Hall at the Bedales Film Festival 2012 where at least 15 films are watched by an appreciative audience and panel of judges including me. Some have been carefully put together over months; some, more Blair Witch Project than high budget, have resulted from the determined and frantic efforts of a wet Sunday afternoon. The range is therefore wide but the standard is impressive and shows a significant tick up from last year. Toby G’s remarkable account of the time he and his two OB brothers spent in the wilds of the Yukon is the winner. Tarquin R’s sensitive account of an old man’s fading musical powers and the spoof silent melodrama involving Celeste M, Georgie D and Rufus R are also deservedly in the top 3. Entirely student-led, colourfully and cleverly masterminded by Fred A and, now in its 3rd year, the Film Festival is one of many beacons to student initiative and creativity.
Medication, and medical problems in general, can certainly cause problems with weight loss. The Kaiser doctor mentioned a number of medications that can impact your weight while dieting. I am not on any medication and don’t have other medical problems (other than, pre-Optifast, the ones associated with being overweight, like high cholesterol and high blood pressure), so I was fortunate. A doctor is the best person to talk to about medical issues and weight loss and/or plateaus.
3) Put into the steaming tray again.Add pandan leaf.Pressure cook for another 5-10 minuts.
*Rest 10 minutes.
I went out to our garage and sat on a beautifully crafted white chair. This was the perfect place to start writing as I had the liberty of watching the tress sway to the direction of the blowing wind. Yet the curse of apathy was still within me. As I was about to subject my ballpen into yet another grueling writing task, I realized that I had forgotten to bring my faithful companions to writing: my thesaurus and my dictionary.
Something You Got
CHICKEN LETTUCE WRAPS
- Harcourt 1608, cited in Baughman 1947.
Perhaps they simply didn't like my response.But often their inquiry simply asks "Are you available on our wedding date?" Surely, they can't be displeased when my answer is "Yes, I am!"
If you have a lot of money women will be drawn to you.
Thankful.
If they continue we’ll be told to hold our tongue, you know
By Nick Jarrett-Kerr
Total weight gain/loss: - 3 lbs
A friend of the couple, a Monsieur Husson (Michel Piccoli), is constantly making passes at Séverine. He’s a womanizer by nature, seemingly incapable of anything else, and his aggressive come ons seem to some degree to be more courtesy extended to her than genuine attempts for her affections. He too seems convinced that Séverine is unassailable in her chastity, giving his illicit courtship a tragi-comedic air of futility. Unfortunately, all it does is frustrate Séverine, who seems as though she only wishes she could indulge in the kinds of casual dalliances Husson takes for granted. In fact, it’s through him that she learns of Parisian brothels, high class places where society housewives go to spend afternoons making extra money in the arms of men who are more interesting than their husbands. It’s meant for something to shock and get a laugh, something inconceivable for the social strata she lives in: a silly thing other, less savory people do. But it’s enough to get Séverine to pry an address out of Husson, and show up at the doorstep of the brothel.
I stayed there for approximately 3 years when because of work commitments I had to leave. When it was time for me to return there was no longer a place for me - a long story, upsetting, not worth sharing really! - so the then District Commissioner found me another Brownie Pack in a village about 5 miles away who were just starting up and needed experienced leaders to help them out. Off I trotted - 2 Brownie mums who were doing the daunting thing by starting up the pack - they thought I had been sent along to check up on them! After much reassurance, they welcomed me with open arms, we went on Pack Holiday and generally had a fantastic time.
Taste - Actually pretty darn good. No hot alcohol, and a bit of caramel and fruitness. The flavors reminded me of a Barleywine, but with Pilsner flavors.
sometimes the path led me through dense groups of trees
Now, many of the benefits of aerobic exercise can also occur as a result of high intensity training. However, one thing that the best coaches in the world discuss is how we silly Americans over-intensify everything, and it’s something that I’ve really started to buy in to. Sometimes we completely overwork our athletes because we are naive and think that “harder means better”. Training athletes is not about bragging rights or bad ass youtube videos. It’s about the most effective and efficient way to increase sports performance. It’s about managing the stressors on the athlete (similar to what I talked about in Part 1), and sometimes high intensity training or “conditioning” is an unnecessary stressor.
This wonton better be cute. Because I am starting to look less and less attractive, and it better be worth it :)
By this time the Carabinieri of Prato!! (Prato is a few kilometres west of Florence, you couldn't get further from the sea in Italy if you tried) have declared the emergency. The Capitaneria, having asserted their acquisition of authority over the ship, calls the captain of the Concordia who is now safely on the shore and orders him back onto the Concordia to take charge of the evacuation of the people on board. He takes the first ferry to Porto Santo Stefano.
Saturdays are the perfect day to tone it down. There are no appointments, no errands to run, no church or family functions to attend to in our home. Saturdays are the day to eat leftovers, to sit on the floor and have tickle fights, there might be a load or two of laundry or some dishes in there but, it is for the most part, a simple quiet day.
HENRY JAGLOM: Well, I'm always wearing a hat. I have a rack, and I have 72 hats. I autograph pictures of myself where I'm two years old wearing a hat.
Ben nodded quietly. “Liesl, lots of people were questioned. Dr. Devoe had many associates, many students. None as close to him as you were, granted. And none of them had to watch him die. I’d do anything to erase that trauma from your life, but I can’t. And you can’t.” He paused. “But you can break its grip on you. You have to let it go.”
The chess game between U.S. and Cuban officials continues today at 4pm when Blitzer interviews spy-diplomat Josefina Vidal, the Head of the North American Division of the Cuban Ministry of Foreign Affairs.
Our sink in the kitchen is made out of stainless steel. Stainless steel , yeah right! W-H-A-T-E-V-E-R! If you don’t dry it up after having used it, you end up with these stains, calcium deposit stains. That drives me crazy, then I drive my family crazy by telling then every one to clean the sink after washing their hands, each time they use the sink.
3. Harry Potter #1 - Rowling (1997)
"But, but, wait," I babbled, "how did you know? How did you find our house? How..."
I'm no different. I was actually a latecomer to the drinking scene, not really getting my feet wet until a year or so before I was legally entitled to do so. Prior to that, I'd have a couple beers now and then, but didn't really go much for the hard stuff. That changed sometime during my sophomore year of college.
The pace is slow, matching the drift of motes in sunlight. Birkin meets another young vet, Moon (Kenneth Branagh), who has been paid to dig up the lost grave of a rich townie's ancestor. Moon is, like Birkin, still damaged from the war, though the quality of his suffering becomes an unexpected parallel with the mysterious artist's life. Birkin, when not drinking tea with Moon or brushing turpentine onto plaster, falls into quiet, intense love with the vicar's wife, Alice Keach (Natasha Richardson).
The second new coven does not seem to hold to the law in this regard. There is concern about how the old group will perceive the validity of the decisions in the new coven. The old coven leaders are welcomed and encouraged to participate in rituals for the new coven’s members. Autonomy seems to be limited by personal authority, which from my perspective is being undermined by the old authority. There is no question about who is running the group day to day. There is only a question about where the power for decision making truthfully lies. Who holds sovereignty?
The necklace is also very fitting. I'm sure there were limited colors available - and I'm also sure that Mister Man chose every single purple bead that he could because he knows that purple is my favorite color. Given how evenly the shirt is cut, I am certain that the teacher created these and simply handed them to the children, which is why the shirt is yellow.
In honour of the very successful visit from Kevin Crossley-Holland we have five copies to give away (in the UK only) of his novel, A Bracelet of Bones.
The pattern is from Pam Palmer's Tatting Treats Two. I see Deb Arnold is selling it for $15.00 and I'm sure many of the tatting vendors also still carry it. Don't be swayed by the Amazon used copies for $38.88. I'm finding any book out of print that deals with lace is being sold for atrocious prices so make sure you shop around. I'm pretty sure Zig-Zag Corner's Tatting Corner also carries it for the normal price.
We were awakened at 1:30 a.m. by "the wailing woman." The woman in the room next to ours was in distress. Not panicked or pained distress, more drawn-out wails of despair distress. She must have been on Day One of her vacation, too.
Hope you enjoy! Leave me some comments if ya try.
I had all
Mattel has sold 3,00,000 Hot Wheels cars in two months and a huge increase in distribution is achieved as stockists who never stocked Mattel started to buy huge stocks. This is one of the best promotions involving both ATL and BTL created for the kid segment in India.
Brown sugar (1/3 cup) or rmore
It’s quiet and calm (unless I’m in the mood for singing and dancing) with soft places to sit and lots of hot tea and peanut M&Ms. Then again, sometimes my happy place is doing something silly with my kids.
To be ensured of consideration, written comments must be received on or before September 8, 2006. No public hearing will be held.
Reuter, E.B., The American Race Problem: A Study of the Negro, Ed. Seba Eldridge. NY: Thomas Y. Crowell, 1927.
Called ARISE around 1:30 and told that Michaelann Bewsee "hasn't come in today." Efrem Gordon called and I mentioned seeing him at the St. Joseph's concert. He said he just went to hear the music and that neither he nor his father was counsel to the church in any way.
I am astounded anyone purporting to be “liberal” or a “Democrat” could still actually advocate voting for Obama. Obama is, in the worst sense, a bad boyfriend. You know that guy. The guy who says he loves you while he holds you down and blacks your eye? Breaks your ribs? Kicks you in the stomach while asking, “Why do you make me do this to you?”
each of My hands;
Hannibal’s Carthaginians – African Infantry
There were disinformation reports out that a European financial meeting this last weekend was a follow-up to the Monaco meeting. This is not true.
The battle was stopped there. Nobody knows whether the son of Durin fled, or died fighting. An appropriately mysterious finale to a great battle.
Common names used for ashwagandha include: Winter Cherry, Withania somnifera (Latin botanical name), and Indian Ginseng to name a few.
And I thought it would be good for you and me to check in
A big tick for Elmhurst Energy, whose backboard asked 'Are you a surveyor, architect or engineeer? Property developer or contractor? Local authority or housing association?
I even made it to church this evening (children were beyond fidgety), though they made up for it earlier by presenting us with their renditions of their favourite Phineas and Ferb Christmas songs. I have included a sample below for those of you who do not have children of a certain age.
Cottonwood Endo IPA was a pretty good American IPA. I really enjoyed this beer and wish I could get it up here in Ohio. Poured a copper brown ale and smelled of caramel malt and hops. It was a nice blend of the hop and malt flavor, it was less hoppy or bitter than other IPA's, but not bad. Was a medium bodied beer and it could get easy to lose count on this one.
I was supposed to be rid of my troubles, having put to rest all my exams but thanks to the Karnataka Board’s frugal efforts at protecting the paper I now have to have a go at it again. Rescheduled timetable and renewed schedules of tension. When all this accumulates in your head you tend to age a bit faster and I think I’ve been going faster than the accepted rate.
A preliminary report said that there was no evidence to show the pelicans had died at sea, but rather on the beach where they were found.
It would seem that the girl, apparently a virgin, sexually frustrated and amazingly unfamiliar with her own anatomy decided to take matters into her own hands and get it on with a coffee straw. She managed to shove the entire straw up her urethra and it was now, according to the ultrasound, lodged and kinked in her bladder. She was quickly passed on to urology.
We’ll be glowing in the dark
I've decided to make this cake a 6-inches, 6 layered cake instead. To bring out the chocolate cake flavour, I frosted the cake with my very own Hazelnut Butter cream (doesn't it sounds like Nutella) and covered the side of the cake with finely crushed Oreo cookie for some added crunch, and topped the cake with dark chocolate Godiva pearls. What do you think? Doesn't it sound divine?
thugs protesting AGAINST the
when i was in vermont last month, this light bulb suddenly switched on. there is an innate resistance to expressing need; and not in the annoying, selfish way, but in a genuine, heartfelt way. it seemed burdensome. i was afraid of abandonment upon someone hearing that i needed something from them, and only them. and then, i would fulfill my own ill-fated prophecy by pushing them, being brute and passive aggressive, instead of honest and vulnerable.
Dear Larry: I write to tell you of something truly remarkable in the field of personal investing.
Crossed Dc - Dc in the second dc from hook. Dc in the skipped dc. (You may want to put a stitch marker in the top ch of this row so you can find it for the join at the end.)
Crossing the lane onto a farm track, the view eastwards gives an indication of the diversity of land use here: hop poles, naked at this time of year, indicate that this traditional Kentish crop is still grown locally, along with winter wheat, more pinstriped fields of lavender, grazing beef cattle, and, on the higher ground across the valley, beyond the Shoreham Road and the railway, forestry plantations and woodland.
It would inevitably lead to an upsurge in alcohol smuggling and illegal brewing and distilling. The authorities have signally failed to make any inroads into tobacco smuggling resulting from ever-increasing duty rates, and it is unlikely they would do any better with alcohol. Unlike legitimate retailers, smugglers are hardly going to exercise much discretion about selling to underage customers. Recently, a Sheffield student had her eyesight permanently damaged by drinking counterfeit vodka, and last year five Lithuanian men were killed in Boston, Lincolnshire, by an explosion at an illegal vodka distillery. Minimum pricing would lead to many more such tragedies.
Then are they glad because they be quiet; so he bringeth them unto their desired haven. Oh that men would praise the LORD for his goodness, and for his wonderful works to the children of men!" PS. 107: 29-31 My God is my Calm. He takes my storms that are so overwhelming and so fierce in my life and on my heart and with nothing more than a whisper from Him an indescribable unexplanable peace and stillness is now where the storm was raging. I Love and thank HIM for this! ~ Bianca
My mind flooded with images that I rarely let myself think. I have been so chaos free now that I almost don't know how I will react when and if I get my wish of another baby. No sleep. No downtime. Feedings. Baby food. Nursing. Crying.
The Truth behind the rumors…..
Tradition said that this was a sacred plant to the druids. It was used as a strewing herb.
Normally I am a movie/television purist so watching a movie without having seen any of the TV series was quite a hard thing for me to get over but when it kicked off and the laughter started, I couldn’t care less if I got caught-out.
Transfer them onto wire rack and cool completely. Store them in a airtight container.
Conversely,they opted for the incomplete trifles,the two who were served the sub-standards were later overheard to say 'there's meant to be something missing from these but I cant see what...'
If you want to support a kid from Shepherd's Field. You can visit their website at www.chinaorphans.org or you can contact me and I can give you information that you can hold in your hand.
Love can answer quintillion questions of gravity-matter-drag
The “regulatory environment has changed even more dramatically than we bargained for,” Hester said in the text of a speech at the Manchester Business School yesterday. “U.K. regulatory reforms on their own have probably cost 10 to 20 billion pounds from our future market value.”
Adele X8, Katy Perry X6, Beyonce, Britney Spears, Lady Gaga, Madonna, Rihanna X2, Pitbull, LeAnn Rimes, Fiona Apple, The Beach Boys, Blood Sweat & Tears, Creedence Clearwarter Revival, Tony Bennett X2, Johnny Otis, Whitney Houston X4, Taylor Swift, “The Hunger Games”, Maroon 5 featuring Christina Aguilera – “The Whistlers” – Whistling Jack Smith (One Hit Wonders)
After spotting several suspicious spots (on my left thigh and my back), I scheduled an appointment with a dermatologist. It was this morning at 10am.
My mom is in town from Korea and this time she did not bring any home made kimchi with her. She could tell I was a little disappointed but quickly made up for it by offering a crash course in quick and easy kimchi making. For Jeana and I it was not quick or easy, but definitely useful as we now have a grasp on what is actually involved in making kimchi.
Step 2: Preheat oven to 350 and line standard muffin pan with 12 paper liners. Whisk both flours in medium bowl. Beat butter in large bowl until smooth. Add sugar; beat to blend. Beat in eggs one at a time.
variation of this type of Bad Flash is the, “Surprise! The narrator was a ghost / cat / unborn baby all along!” ending, which, despite presenting a clear danger to public health, is yet to be criminalised.
In the 1970s Wandrei commenced a long and tedious process of litigation against Arkham House, the publishing company he had helped to found.
I still can't believe my baby girl turned ONE.
But his father was a junky, mum's a gambler - Mickey was bred to steal
It’s only been two weeks since I started training hard for the May 6 5k – but I’ve already shaved off about 5 minutes from my finishing time. I’m aiming for 40 minutes…but we shall see!
When I couldn’t handle anything, my anxiety was there to distract me, panic was always lurking in the shadows, ready to steal anything and everything that I had going for me.
Cumin seeds - 1 teaspoon
The Competition is a Media Event and will be recorded for both Television and Radio.
Is there anything else you'd like to talk about or add?
Looking forward to sharing some new ideas with you when I get home. I still have another week here. I don't know if I can handle all the relaxation by the pool and the sunshine, but I will certailny try.
Dear Tree by Doba Rivka Weber with illustrations by Phyllis Saroff
I had been inspired to write the book in part by the sudden demise of a boy at my real-life high school. I recalled the adults of the time wanting to gloss over what happened. It was almost as though an untimely death was something to be embarrassed about. Hardly anybody really talked to the teenagers there and then. My mother made an effort, but I felt obligated to reassure her. It was the Kansas suburbs in the 1980s, and everyone was supposed to appear cheerful and well adjusted.
screenshot at 825pm CDT 5/2/2012:
Obviously inside the Mr. Toilet House the visitors can see all kinds of toilets and learn toilet history. You can find more information about museum and photos of the toilets here
as she got up from her chair.
So, if you have a request to make of Our Heavenly Father and
…the essence of mastering systems thinking as a management discipline lies in seeing patterns where others see only events and forces to react to.
I've not posted since the Christmas holidays. It's simply been too busy. This seems paradoxical, as we've had extended periods of being snowed in, but at that point we had nothing much to report. Since the thaw, we've probably gone a bit overboard with activity to make up for the prolonged Christmas veg-out.
This month was a big one for you in terms of discoveries and milestones.
Browsing the images and videos there will give a pretty good feel for the approach, absent the underlying algorithms. This tool seems to be screaming to be fed some intelligent back-end, automated semantic data / knowledge mining from large topical repositories. I particularly like the fluid interface and the visual metaphor of people (or institutions, or any objects) as being “in” knowledge domains, as well as the conversion of all those wretched hairballs of network connections to density maps or clusters. (Yes, I get it, your software can track millions of connections. I don’t need to see them all to get my job done any more than I need to see the subroutine calls of my operating system. It’s your job as programmer to make hay with them quietly and out of sight…)
Hi there and welcome to day three of teasers from My Favorite Things! Today we are introducing Clearly Sentimental About Anniversaries and Big Greetings. They are two terrific sentiment sets!
One more brand new
My son’s school is having an administrative meltdown for the second year in a row, and community moral is very low. More serious conversations are in store, with no resolution in site. I am feeling very sad about this, and have been looking around for some kind of fourth party perspective to help me understand why people will treat each other like like dirt (back to surviving…)
Without a word of confession to her church—with no “heads up” to the people who would suffer from her “coming out”—she treks off to Maryland, stands before 1,500 people and confesses for the world to hear that she is a minister who doesn’t believe. She returns home and her son sends her a text, telling her that her confession went viral. Only then does she decide its time to meet with her District Superintendant. But it’s too late. The damage is done.
Interesting also, is that of the total debt of $344.819m, that pertaining to all Transport Network, Public Health, City Development, Museums (including OSM, and Chinese Garden), Sport Recreation & Leisure (excluding all things stadium), and Corporate Support add up to $140.881m. So, it can readily be seen just what a tremendous burden the stadium is upon the city.
As leaders in Athens accepted the need for a new general election to end a national stalemate, the International Monetary Fund said Europe’s leaders should prepare for the possibility of a Greek departure from the single currency.
There seems to be an assumption that it is the responsibility of the man in the relationship to buy flowers, candy, or arrange for dinner out. In this household, most of the time there are cards exchanged, sometimes flowers are received (by me-although back in the early days I did get Husband flowers….he didn’t seem too excited about that), and often a dinner out. The dinner out is a gift for both of us, as neither is usually very excited about cooking.
* making a necklace of safety pins in lieu of the ribbon that was typically worn with a robe a la francaise
In a large mixing bowl, beat butter and 1 ¼ cups sugar until fluffy and pale in color.
Starts on Friday 18th November 2011 at 6pm – ends on Sunday 20th November 2011 mid-afternoon. Led by Fr Armand de Malleray, FSSP.
Had I taken a path other than the one I chose at a given moment, where would I be now?
"The Last Supper takes place within this context, but with a fundamental newness. Jesus looks to His Passion, Death and Resurrection fully aware of them. He wills to experience this Supper with His disciples, but with a wholly unique character, different from all other banquets: It is His Supper, in which He gives Something totally new: Himself. Thus it is that Jesus celebrates His Passover and anticipates His Cross and Resurrection."
man is Hershel Kaminsky. He has a chair
A banana, large, is safely tucked away in my stomach. Tomato and basil soup plus Kettle crisps are waiting their turn. Lunchtime.
We need to build community.
Through the years I have carried the phrase, "bird by bird" with me. Whenever things become overwhelming, I remind myself, "take it bird by bird". I suppose you could say it has become my mantra when life gets busy and there seems to be so much to do.
Procol Harum- A Salty Dog
. . . it only led to pretty slim pickens but I did find a great ironstone bowl and pitcher for Susan, some oil cans for Donna's classes, a nice green wool blanket, a spool for those "Crazy at Home" projects and a cute little vintage sewing box. We're still looking for other special requests : dough bowls for Susan & Susan, a victorian oak easel for Laurie and a fabulous farm table for Tammy. If anyone else has something you would like us to put on our search list, just send us an e-mail and we'll do our best!
Accessories: Brayer, Post-it-notes, Grosgrain ribbon, Glue dots and Dimensionals
Sent: Friday, April 27, 2012 9:04 PM
I am grateful for dynamic energy, and for a calm place to assess all that has been done and all that still needs doing.
But after reading the article about the latest situation of the Murano glass techniques in Italy and its debacle made me write this blog.
Hongo appeared in over fifty films at Daiei, including Satsuo Yamamoto's THE BRIDE FROM HADES (1968), Kimiyoshi Yasuda's ALONG WITH GHOSTS (1969), and Tokuzo Tanaka's THE HAUNTED CASTLE (1969), before switching gears to television following after the studio's bankruptcy in 1971, where he continued with an extremely successful and prolific career. Perhaps his biggest television role was his incredible run as Detective Takeshi Tachibana in a whopping 457 hours (Episodes 53-509) of the long-running, all-star Toei crime drama, SPECIAL INVESTIGATION: FRONTLINE (1977-87). His series co-stars included Hideaki Nitani, Hideji Otaki, Hiroshi Fujioka, Toshiyuki Nishida, Yusuke Natsu, Naoya Makoto, and Shigeru Araki.
Conservatives believe that if a person is unable to fend for him/herself due to physical limitations, lack of mental acuity or some other handicap, then they deserve to be helped. We also believe that if a person WILL NOT fend for him/herself when fully able to do so, society has no obligation to fend for him/her.
The last couple of swaps I've participated in with the Great Swaps Girls group have had fewer participants, but there's still a die-hard group of demonstrators who usually participate. We did two swaps in January - one for the Occasions Mini Catalog and one for Sale-a-Bration. I'll start off today by showing you the cards I made for the swap.
Running through the jungle, the fugitive, a brunette woman named Rosa Phillips (Esther Studer), is being pursued by rifle-wielding guards in khaki shorts. Eventually finding her way to the home of Dr. Arcos (Jess Franco), the wounded (a couple of bullets grazed her during her perilous flight to freedom) escapee thinks she has found sanctuary. But think again, Miss Phillips. You're going to have to stagger more than a couple of miles through some dense bush to escape the clutches of Greta, the torturer. Mumbling about shock treatment as she's carted away, the doctor wonders why Rosa, a woman who is supposedly being treated for a sexual abnormality (nymphomania, lesbianism, and prostitution are the clinic's specialties) would need to be tortured.
First of all I enjoy wine - Kate as well! I'm not an expert on wine, I've never done any serious study about wine however over the years I have enjoyed tasting different wine, buying wine, doing a little bit of reading about wine, learning about the regions, differences in vintages and visiting a few cellar doors.
But in actual fact, we've had a pleasant few days. It can be quite difficult to entertain visitors who don't really want to see the place, and would be happy enough to just sit in the apartment for the duration. But I took them to Schloss Charlottenburg on Friday and managed to provide them with some impromptu entertainment by getting myself thrown out (and very likely banned) from a mausoleum. It wasn't fun. After listening to a lengthy list of 'Do's and Don't's' from the attendant outside it was a bit embarrassing to see the same attendant racing into the mausoleum at warp-speed to drag me out no more than a minute later. But on the positive side at least I found out that my phones 'silent' mode doesn't work. Silver lining's and all that I suppose. And it put a smile on my visitors faces for the rest of the afternoon seeing me hauled out and publicly shamed. And that set us up for the rest of the weekend which was pleasant and a lot less eventful.
In clear violation of our First Amendment rights, Barack Obama – with his radical, pro abortion and extreme secularist agenda, now seems intent on following a similar path.
So you see, Egyptologists and other Western scholars got it wrong because they are not culturally in sync with the Kamitic thinking, which was holistic. It was because of my experience guided by the wisdom of my padrino, that allowed me to rediscover and resurrect my own divinity. Thereby connecting to God, which allowed me to see the sacredness of all things. In other words, I had to see God through my Ebony Eyes in order to get a holistic perspective to improve my life. This is why I am eternally grateful for meeting my padrino because without him I would never have had the pleasure of meeting the orisha Ochossi (Oxossi) and later the netchar Maat.
T-boy talked about how he had moved on from Agriculture and had done some IT professional exams and now he is doing a masters in Information Systems. All these would not have moved me very much until T-boy said words similar to these : ” I plan to head straight home after my masters. I think I can make a difference at home. I have a few ideas. I aspire to be an IT Auditor. To make this happen, I intend to commit to taking some accounting exams also. Some time ago I passed my CISA exam but I won’t stop there.”
Please leave a comment.
We'll be seated not far from the stage so that all our senses can be drenched in delight. The gossamer tutus of the sugar plum fairies....the orchestra weaving the magic that is Tchaikovsky's Nutcracker suite with bow and reed...
The weekend we returned from Disneyland, I learned of a horrible DUI crash that claimed the life of my friend's 11 year old son. My friend was on-call one Friday night for our Nuclear Medicine department and was called to the hospital around 2am. His wife was out of town so he took his 11 & 7 year old sons with him on this ride. A drunk driver, attempting to ditch the police whom were chasing him, ran a red light and t-boned my friend. His 11 year old died at the hospital that night from blunt head trauma. His 7 year old had a pelvic fracture and splenic laceration but will survive. My friend was also released with no major injuries (physical anyway.)
I'll tell you what surprises me most. That George Younger had any export trade at all by the end of WW I. Pretty much everything you could imagine had been against it. Not least of which were the German U boats.
La’s There she goes UK
Today, there was another good reason. The AGM was full of workers from Brough, facing redundancy. Dick Olver made some attempt to set the anti-arms activists and the Brough workers against each other. He suggested that Brough might have remained open had the company received more orders from Saudi Arabia – after the Campaign Against Arms Trade (CAAT) had attacked sales to the Saudi regime.
God. Some people would call it God. It’s my calling you know. It’s kinda like I’m believing that I’m doing things for a reason and then certain opportunities come up and I weigh the options. I had a friend of mine explain life like a fork. At some points its like things just make sense and you have these tuning fork moments where you’re like aw, this is what I’m supposed to do. You don’t have those a lot but as you get older and you look back it all starts making sense and you realize that’s kinda your path. I feel like music has been that way. There was a time that where it was purely just what I did for enjoyment. I would play for friends at a party. I started playing in bars for crowds of 50 people. I played for my students at school. It felt right. My goal was just to be able to make a living doing it so I expected to be touring about three hours from home and playing for a few hundred people every night and the next thing I knew I was playing for thousands of people and now I’m touring all over the country.
Porous borders in Afghanistan allow frequent trafficking to occur between it and Pakistan. Many girls are trafficked from refugee camps and end up in sexual exploitation or forced labour.
Use your voice to turn SA in the right direction, writes TSHEPO DIALE of Ga-Rankuwa.
Speaking of sleepless nights and druids, the last time I did sleep I had the most bizarre of dreams. I don’t remember much about the dream itself, but I do remember one thing: large, black and white bears. Except they were anthropomorphic bears, like a bear standing on two legs. They were white, but they looked like someone had punched them in each eye, since they had black patches around their eyes. You would expect that these black-eyed bears might be some new druid form as of yet unknown, but they didn’t seem to be druids at all, more like a different type of warrior. It was very bizarre. I probably shouldn’t have eaten those leftovers as a late night snack the night before. Anduin says that dreams can be prophetic, but I really don’t believe this is prophetic in any way. I think this is more a lesson that one should be careful what they eat before falling asleep.
Assignment: 3-month, temporary assignment; 20 hours/week
What is Scheduled in Manassas
The investigation states that interviews revealed “antagonism and divisive behaviour and spirit” and “ an air and culture of infighting and discontent” and “a culture of mistrust ” .
Jaleel & Kym – 37
Called FARNC for short.
Roberts, Michael “Alex” Kuhendrarajah and the Australian media,” www.thuppahi. wordpress.com, 25 January 2010. Also in South Asian Masala, 20 Jan 2009.
3. Iconic, classic, renaissance and socially responsible.
Deschooling is an ongoing process whereby kids and parents recover from the sort of brain cancer that happens in school.
»Scene 8: iCarly studio«
MF: David Silva (Manchester City) – Let not his late-season dip in form distract from how brilliant he was for most of this season. He leads the highest scoring team in the league (at this point) in assists, and is tied for the overall league lead (at this point) in assists. Add half a dozen goals to that and he’s put together a mighty fine season.
I remembered the pain of a previous root canal over a decade ago. It was so awful that I cringed just thinking about it.
Things with Jamie are more difficult.
Oh,hi.
But the details. It's amazing. And then you think of how Amsterdam was built - the Dutch literally pushed back the sea to build the city. dam means dike in Dutch (hehehe so many "d's") and the canals were a way of channeling the water. Now the canals are fresh water, but they used to have salt water in them. Most of the buildings are leaning, apparently from what I gathered, it's because the foundations shift (because they are founded on water) - a little bit like Venice, but with a different approach; I'm pretty sure they have clay/mud foundations. So..soil. but in the ocean/canals.
I have been playing around with my new OPI I Lily Love You, from the Nice Stems Collection, 2011 for the past few days. It's amazing how different it looks over different base coats. This alone makes it worth the money.
Heat a tava until red hot.
Fortunately, Mr Young and Robbie arrive and distract us from our irritable speculations. I forget who won the match.I should be interested, I know, but I’m just not. I am a rubbish wife sometimes.
Aidan John Coons was born just after 8am on June 21st, 2011. Aidan is a name that we've both loved for a while and had picked out for a few years (unfortunately it is now the most popular boys name) and his middle name, John, is for my Dad and Chad's Grandpa Coons.
Hebrews 2:3-4 How shall we escape, if we neglect so great salvation; which at the first began to be spoken by the Lord, and was confirmed unto us by them that heard him; God also bearing them witness, both with signs and wonders, and with divers miracles, and gifts of the Holy Ghost, according to his own will?
“Fear not, daughter of Zion;
Her New York debut was a 1927 job fronting Paul Whiteman and his Orchestra at the Paramount Theatre. In the 1927 Ziegfeld Follies she introduced another hit “Shaking the Blues Away”. The following year she appeared in both Eddie Cantor’s Whoopie! and Ed Wynn’s Simple Simon. While continuing to appear on stage, she went into films in the thirties, such as Eddie Cantor’s Roman Scandals (1933), and Hip Hip Hooray (1934), Gift of Gab (34) and 30 shorts for Paramount and Warner Brothers.
1. In a large bowl put all ingredients together. Season with pepper, salt and broth powder.
I had to reduce the resolution of the file to be able to upload it here. The original uncut version is 225 MB.
But, we are now bigger. We now are the “shapers” (for the most part) of our destiny. How much different do we deem love to be now?
Winners will have 48 hours to get in contact with the vendors to claim their prizes, otherwise another winner will be drawn.
“Let’s go,” I said, my hand extended to him. “We’ve got work to do. How do you want to start?”
I hope I don't lose any more.
do not commit this folly
to a single outlook and perception of depth, for discernment.
www.WovenWomen.blogspot.com www.CynthiaStiverson.com
My Islam is an ongoing education
The most important and vital element of active listening is your honest interest to understand the other person, to understand what speaks about and what really means. It is not about you to be understood. The moment for you to be understood is when you say your own story!
-"You still need some sort of proof."
That I just keep hanging on to
Dis a war.
Then it’s a chance to get used to working with other people on your book, taking on board suggestions and working on them. This is really important for when an agent or editor wants you to make changes. And it’s invaluable for when you finally get your first edits from an editor – you’ll be used to all that red on your precious work!
Are you allergic to anything:
The other morning we were getting ready to take Super Catman to the Orthodontist. I donned a pair of Capri's I found for $1 at a second hand store a month or two ago. I asked him what he thought, he said "fine dear". As the day progressed, I noticed that the Capri's looked terrible.
awareness without observation
We'd love to see your take on our theme of New Beginnings and don't forget that ALL the Christmas stamps are on sale for 50% off at the Digi Doodle Store!
At any rate, I give the bag two big thumbs up. Huge. The gentlemen loved it, too. Perfect product, very well made. I am SOLD. (And I suspect a few will be hitting stockings at Christmas, too...) If you need a concealed carry option or simply a way to carry while backpacking, this is the gear for you. Worth the price.
“What are we to do, then? Are we to fight against the pope, as well as the Turk, since the one is as godly as the other?” Answer: Treat the one like the other and no one is wronged; like sin should receive like punishment. I mean that this way. If the pope and his followers were to attack the empire with the sword, as the Turk does, he should receive the same treatment as the Turk; and this is what was done to him by the army of Emperor Charles before Pavia. For there stands God’s verdict, “He that takes the sword shall perish by the sword.” I do not advise that men go to war with the Turk or the pope because of his false belief or evil life, but because of the murder and destruction which he does. But the best thing about the papacy is that it has not yet the sword, as the Turk has; otherwise it would surely undertake to bring the whole world into subjection, though it would accomplish no more than to bring it to faith in the pope’s Koran, the decretals. For he pays as little heed as the Turk to the Gospel, or Christian faith, and knows it as little, though with fasts, which he himself does not keep, he makes a great pretense of Turkish sanctity; thus they deserve the reputation of being like the Turk, though they are against Christ.
Chicken Meatballs
So I actually ended up having a very productive day yesterday, and managed to not only start - but complete - my Macaron dress from Colette Patterns.
Of the wild, my dreams now
(metaphorically speaking, of course).
Today my phone has rang over 11 times today since 7 am. She called to find out when I was coming, even though she asked me at 10:30 last night. So I tell her, then 10 minutes later she calls and asks again, what time am I coming. The she begins to cry. She hurts, her leg and knee hurts, she wants me to be there now and I can't. Visiting hours do not start until 10, but time makes no difference. The part of the brain that understands time, isn't functioning correctly.
I'm not going to lie, I was a wee bit nervous when I made the dough for these cookies last night. It seemed so dry with only 4 egg yolks and 1 tsp of vanilla as the only liquids. I sort of set myself up for failure, only to be pleasantly surprised when they turned out well this morning!
1 1/2 teaspoons cream of tartar
"In creating Bushmills Irish Honey, I wanted to make a blend that had a smooth finish enhanced by warm characteristics, and that maintained the great taste and aroma of our original blend," said Colum Egan, Bushmills master distiller. "We knew that Irish honey, in the right quantity, would be the perfect ingredient to bring the blend to life."
~Lea L.
- I say: But Faber is the california kid, support your local team woman!
Closing date for entries will be 2nd August. Good Luck x
“It was a popular movement and then it more or less got co-opted by the politicians and it seemed to dissolve throughout the country,” he told Yahoo News.
The flight was good and short. I arrived in Yogyakarta before midday. The airport was a small one, like the one in Pekanbaru. I got out of the airport fast enough and walked out the arrival area.
Just a quick post to let you know that tomorrow will be the last day of collaborating with Laurel, not today. She had another post to do, so we decided to wrap up our fun week tomorrow.
Due to the theft of intellectual properties from FIRE-EARTH blog, the Moderators are reluctant to publish tornado forecasts for the 2012 season.
As I said before, on the 1st of January, nearly everything was closed! However, the 2nd was the day the sales started in many shops. So what else to do, but shop?
WTF grabs Attack Watch by the throat…CHOKE SLAM THROUGH THE BROADCAST TABLE!
This is something I never take for granted. Having passed the half century mark four years back I am all too aware of the ageing process and, being fearful of middle age spread , I exercise regularly, eat sensibly and drink moderately. In consequence I feel in better shape than I did 20 years ago.
2 cups of bread flour
You acting tough like you fought like me before
A quick update!
In less than two weeks (on March 16th, to be exact), I'll be turning 19. Almost two decades on this earth.
I water I
Below is a quick reference to help fill in your knowledge gaps, and get you participating in the Net and the Web quickly. All of these About.com references can be printed, and are free for you to use thanks to our advertisers.
this is the favourite. papers for the last 2 are from the my minds eye "complete boy" 12 x 12 stack.
Today would have been a great sick day.
Gwyneth Paltrow twitted that she had a horrific hangover celebrating her 39th birthday. She lost a front tooth and can't recall how she ended up with Mike Tyson's tiger.
I found this to be a very thought-provoking review of Issacson’s book from a well-respected and thoughtful Christian. If you have any interest in Apple, Steve Jobs…and Christianity, you might want to check this out.
There are more word problems in general. As before the change, the curriculum still has lots of instruction about mental math in addition and subtraction.
8. Less Likely to Get Sick and Feel Healthy: Drinking plenty of water helps fight ailments like the flu, kidney stones, and heart attack. Water mixed with lemon is used primarily for ailments like respiratory disease, intestinal problems, rheumatism and arthritis etc. Drinking water also improves our immune system.
Valley has chosen this season’s hottest color, Tangerine. Tangerine is warm, vibrant & perfect for this time of year. It will give your Spring-wear a pop of color! Pairing this high-low cut dress with a wide snakeskin waist-defining belt adds gorgeous shape to any body type & also adds great texture next to the silk dress. Topping off the look with a casual jean jacket & chunky wooden heels is the perfect way to make a grand entrance at a bridal shower without stealing any sparkle away from the bride-to-be.
Does Peter hold the key to our eternal life? Today we are looking at Acts 1:15,
This boy is my first born, and it's his birthday.
Being stuck in a closet while your living relative sits awkwardly in the living room after just being told that after they die strange mysterious things will be done to them and they won’t be able to stop it.
after every other broken-up encounter
Perhaps this was the beginning of my lifelong gambling addiction though none of my friends enjoyed risking their milk money quite as much as I did.
was all the rage), Bush connected with the imagination of
But in reality, worship isn’t always an ascent. It’s not even always musical, or rhythmic, or polished…or VISIBLE.
OMG SO GROSS. BESTIALITY IS NOT OKAY.
SHOW DATES: Saturday August 4th – Sunday August 19th, 2012
Even my favorite authors have the letter J in their names! Johanna Lindsey, Judith Mcnaught, Sabrina Jeffries, etc. It gets me thinking, why is my life so linked to the letter J? I don't like it much! But somehow, everything I do, it is related to that! It's kinda weird?
I’m knee deep in engagement decorations which explains my absence from my blog. So I thought I’d feature some of the designers, crafters and makers on madeit.com. This is the on line market place I joined a couple of months ago and I’m so glad I did. I’ve had more success in 3 short months on madeit than I have in 3 or 4 years on Artfire (still tossing up about closing my store there).
A Review of the Pioneer AVH-P3100DVD
However, this is the life, I’m estimating, of about 95% of women in the Western world. And most have full-time jobs on top of it. Even many of those that have the means to have a staffed house feel that if they are not the one who is changing the diaper or serving the meal, they are lacking in wife and mother credits.
Now greet Magia, I picked her name so I really like it, it's Spanish for magic. She was found in the classified ads too but her story is a little different. I was telling my partner last Wednesday that I'd love to have a black kittie with orange eyes. I woke up early the next day and felt like checking the ads again in my mom's phone just because I was too bored. There she was, the first on the list of cats to adopt which means she was the most recently listed. I called the number and she was still available, it was meant to be. She used to be a stray that a young couple fed and groomed. They told me that her mother (who gave birth in their porch) belonged to a neighbor that seems to hoard cats she doesn't even have a way to feed. So they told her that they were going to find a home for the newborn kittens and she agreed. Magia is no longer a newborn, she is around 5 months and she is probably too tiny for her age. I brought her home on Monday as well but she is still hidden and wouldn't let me get close. Let's hope she understands that this is her home very soon.
The video of my niece and nephews singing me happy birthday,
This is a log line. Avoid them.
What we are then reading and watching on a daily basis is nothing more than manipulative talking-points peddled by disingenuous, entirely compromised “journalists” delivering propaganda in the service of lobbying firms, instead of the accurate, responsible journalism people expect them to in the service of a well informed citizenry. A misdirected and confused public is one of the main factors as to why many of today’s problems cannot be solved. A problem cannot be solved if it cannot even be properly understood.
I was thinking quite long wether I should post a picture of me wearing the bikini or not..
b) have the Goodwill ottoman reupholstered in a new fabric;
I'm not crazy about how it turned out,
SPOT THE SHOP!
He wrote something, and handed me a slip of paper.
Sat May 3rd & Sun May 4th
The doctor was shocked, but agreed to give it a try.
I think I am ready to buy myself a new camera.......kinda like the one that got stolen from my house. I dont think I will cry this time If i go look at them at best buy.
Portland's first certified organic brewery, founded in March 2001 by Mike De Kalb and Cathy Woo-De Kalb, Laurelwood has grown from its original 7 barrel Laurelwood Public House & Brewery. In 2007 Laurelwood relocated to the former Sylvia's Dinner Theater (5115 NE Sandy Blvd.) and upgraded to a 15 barrel brewery to help keep up with growing demands. In 2009 they opened a new pub in Battle Ground, WA that includes a 2 barrel "Nano" brewery to allow experimentation on new and innovative beer recipes. Laurelwood is also represented at PDX Airport on Concourses A and E as well as at Portland's Rose Garden Arena. During this time they have sold the original location and shuttered the NW pub.
Jason Christopher DeFazio, 29, New York, N.Y.
Min 8: #31 came here because the following search terms led him astray: “between chubby and slender women which one are sweet when having sex” (I’m not kidding!), “bunny with down syndrome”, and “where do I find crack whores in manhattan”. But, once #31 realized this is NOT a blog with maps detailing where to find manhattan crack whores, filled with pictures of dancing bunnies with down syndrome, and articles discussing the difference between rubenesque and slender women having sex, well, once he realized that he immediately unfollowed. Fine, #31, but had you only given me some time, it could’ve been all those things for you and more.
Once the crab cake mixture has chilled in the refrigerator, scoop some of the crab cake mixture and hand shape into a patty which is about 2 ½ to 3 inches in diameter. Set aside.
One of my girlfriends at work is also a makeup/fashion/polish junkie like myself. We're always talking trends, new buys, and we're constantly racing to show each other our new goods.
just before the touch
Mugabe reversed all this. That much we know. But who was the Prince among Men responsible for the good times? We are never told. The phantom was Ian Smith, prime minister of Rhodesia, RIP. Smith was ostracized by the international community which refused to recognize his minority rule, and treated him like it treated Saddam Hussein, with boycotts and sanctions. The British would not rest until Smith ceded power. When Mugabe was elected Leader for Life in 1980, he celebrated the West’s stupidity by committing his first major massacre in 1983. While Dr. Robert Mugabe was eliminating 20,000 innocent Ndebele in Matabeleland, his pals in the US were busy bestowing on him honorary doctorates. By the time the Queen of England knighted Sir Robert Mugabe in 1994, he had already done his “best” work.
Listen hard enough, and you will sense them smile.
I’m on Team Nat through all of life. I love you.
Fittingly, the B.B. King Museum can be found in the town where he was born: Indianola. The museum is straight ahead in the picture, and the building to the right is an old cotton mill. The Mississippi Delta is considered the birthplace of the blues. And B.B.? Well, he was ... the king.
Even before she gets me she tells me of next weekend and how she'll get her fill,
· webinars and conference calls
The First Militia Brigade were caught in March column as they attempted to force their way across the bridge by weight of numbers and came up short against Butlers Rangers.
January 13, 2012
"Someone dropped a chocolate bar down Kings Avenue! You would have loved it!"
One possibility suggested for the incompatibility of theories is that they are differently structured, for instance, queer theory is about a sexualized subject, not a racialized subject (Somerville 197). This seems to be plainly wrong; all people are racialized, as all people are sexualized, classed, and so on, and at all times. One cannot simply ignore a facet of their subject’s existence simply because it is simpler to talk about another facet that way; the components of a person’s greater identity are inextricably connected, tangled-up in one another (Somerville 198). A person is simply too complex for such a reductive analysis.
Donna: "And what about you?"
So, that is an intro to my fiction for those of you who choose to follow I appreciate it and will try to keep you entertained. Oh yeah, a heads up, I am and will be a very sporadic poster, sorry.
Well, to be honest, I’m still learning that last one.
I am still pretty frustrated at my time. Reflecting on what went wrong I point towards the head. My warmest run was low 70’s without any humidity. I was far from acclimated to the upper 80’s and high humidity experienced on Saturday. After the race though, I treated myself to a nice Philly Cheese Steak sandwich from Dave and Busters. I am not certain it was good, but I was just glad to be done running.
As Sunday rolls to a close I thought I would share some of the images I captured in my varied and busy weekend. I was most relieved on Friday afternoon to end my work week. It had been exhausting and challenging on several levels but I decided that instead of thinking about the “issues” all weekend I would do as my Savior tells me to do and cast my worries Him. You know I must say when practiced this works! I am feeling refreshed on many levels this evening and ready to begin the week afresh tomorrow.
'Afternoon. :) It's so nice outside today. 75 degrees. Sunshiney....bird singy....it kinda makes a girl happy, ya know? I've been all hummy and smiley for no good reason, other than that. :) Maybe my underwear's riding up...
Why don’t you seek rest in my arms
Like National Days, England doesn’t really DO food awfully well. Before any of you start up huffing and puffing about how things have come a long way, and littering your comments with references to great British chefs and fancy restaurants, I mean national dishes. Roast beef (take an expensive piece of meat, dry it out in an oven, serve with plain boiled vegetables and fatty potatoes) Pie and mash (take some cheap pieces of meat, cook them in water with boring vegetables like potatoes and carrots. possibly add something hideous like kidneys or oysters. Boil potatoes and squash them up with milk, serve with lurid, unpleasant, green sauce. It’s a fairly tedious formula. Meat, milk, root vegetables, not a lot of flavour.
2) If you could meet any 3 people, living or dead, who would they be and why?
Tel: +81-75-701-7223 Fax: +81-75-702-1952 email: info@greenaction-japan.org
Ps. thank you everyone for helping me choose what tshirt to get in my last post, it was very unanimous that the first tshirt was the best so last night I bought it! Thank you so much xx
Happy Bundt Day everyone! And yay to Mary the Librarian for surviving Year 3 of her Bundt marathons!
I miss you! I am not sure WHAT I miss about you. Maybe it is the whole, "process my thoughts" thing that I miss. I know I am having thoughts. Maybe just not important ones?
Deodorant ( NON AEROSOL)
Recently I was out to dinner with friends. We sat outside at a tapas bar, and an older gentleman played soft, slow Brazilian jazz. The owner of the restaurant, a tall, slim man with a Brooklyn accent I couldn’t quite believe was real, danced with his wife on the little brick patio, and his loose, light stepping made my throat tighten. He danced like my dad. Controlled but free, fluid and graceful and lithe...I longed to ask him to dance with me. He may very well have, but I was more afraid that were we to dance, I would lay my head on his shoulder and weep.
A lot of fuss was made from unorganised random indivudal shock, indivual experiences witnessed by local people and this is where riots occur, peace protestors like the military are far more organised and use controlled methods of making a point when campaigning. This has not really included Afghanistan here in the UK as you will find out when you go over to Stirring Trouble Internationally. Its right to think that there is not any reason to make a fuss, the point is why do people make such a fuss about nothing when one person see’s something or one thing happens to one person. More to the point why is protesting such a hot topic in breaking news when clearly the protesting follows no code and serves no real purpose, other than give a voice to the pride of any pack.
So - without further ado - the winner is ..
Brigitta F. D’Amato is a Certified Clinical Hypnotherapist in the American Council of Hypnotist Examiners; an Alchemical Hypnotherapist, a Certified Group Process Facilitator, and an Instructor of Alchemical Hypnotherapy in the Alchemical Hypnotherapy Institute; she is a California State Certified Instructor of Hypnotherapy, a State Licensed Practitioner of Religious Science for the International Centers for Spiritual Living and a Designated Examiner in the American Council of Hypnotist Examiners.
vulnerable to minor disturbances and/or management changes."
Here’s what would I would say if I spoke my mind:
Toss the cauliflower in 2 tablespoons olive oil, roast in the oven at 450 degrees for 35 minutes until golden brown. Remove and set aside.
And a little sleep goes a long way toward feeling good.
And I'll never forget the sound of Jill's voice when she called me from the hospital that night. "Glenn is dead," she cried, her voice trembling with unimaginable grief. I had to ask her to repeat it, because I didn't think I heard her right. "Glenn is dead," came her tearful reply. I almost dropped the phone. When I got to the hospital, the look in Jill's eyes was unlike anything I had ever seen before. A part of her had died. In the blink of an eye, her life had changed forever.
I forgive myself that I haven’t accepted and allowed myself to see and realize that no matter what I received and achieved in my life I was never fulfilled and within that I still tried to look for more and more experiences to fulfill myself completely missing the actual problem of self-interested isolation into individual bubble from all the existence
i can't wait for pictures at the end of this month, and until then i'll have to settle with my crappy camera and my memory. i love him!
I’m not receiving a dime for posting this. I just think that this is something worth looking into!
The chair I have shown in the boards above is noted as just a "swivel" chair so I'm apprehensive to purchase the chair and then find out it has no "rock" or "glide." Don't be surprised if the nursery chair gets swapped out in the next inspiration boards.
On Wednesday, the Federal Court granted immigration minister Jason Kenney's request for a judicial review of the refugee board decision that allowed Brandon Carl Huntley to stay in Ottawa.
Among the most controversial of the proposed sites are those at Camerton, Stanton Wick and Radstock.
4) If experience defines the limit of what can be known, it is absurd to posit a distinction between the “mental” and the “physical.” Hume’s version is quite as hard as #3 because it produces the same conclusion that it makes no sense to speak of either side of the duality of mind and matter: both concepts collapse simultaneously. It is neither materialist nor idealist, but a position of non-duality. This view is shared by Berkeley.
I can't help feeling that If I was managing a team in a large business that was at the centre of corporate feedback, as CR/sustainability teams often are, I'd have to adopt a similar approach.
In the entertainment world, let’s have a half-baked limited-run TV reality series in which contestants are locked in a house and not allowed to talk to each other. Only menacing stares, threatening glances, heavy sighs and chimp-like grunts are permitted. In the season finale, all participants will be allowed to file restraining orders against each other and lawsuits against the producers. Ensuing trials will be conducted using semaphore flags.
Nobody likes to be deceived; especially when we have invested our hearts (and checkbooks) into what we thought was the truth. However, even worse than feeling deceived, in my opinion, is feeling embarrassed by my own impulsive ideas and words after falling victim to the media monster known as the MOB MENTALITY. I don’t know about you, but more than a few times, I have experienced that shameful comedown after being part of a group rant and realizing that I may not have had all the information. (Why do I always compare my life to scenes in Lord of the Flies?!)
Heidi, her husband and kids moved to Idaho several years ago.
Their first attempt at commercial music was the release of an album entitled ‘Happy Day’ in 2006. Then, their third member, Amobi Clems (Clem Igwebuike Amobi), aka Bistop- who’s since left the group for academic pursuit- was still around.
The most impressive part of this is a story from the Los Angeles Times today. The Dems’ anti-redlining, pro-homeownership squeeze on the lenders has done this for U.S. housing:
I stamped Tilda with snow heart onto a piece of white card and then created a mask with a post it note. Once Tilda had been masked I used the welcome to a sweet Christmas background stamp over Tilda so it looks like she is standing at her front door.
If BMW can create a steeper wing without the problem of stalling, teams that have struggled with high-downforce set-ups could follow this trend.
Of my beloved
SCREENSHOT
94 Watership Down – Richard Adams
Sweet goodies: cupcake mix (just add milk, egg, butter, oil....what i exactly is in this packet? flour?) cinnamon meringue, chocolate chip cookies (Fair-trade), strawberry- hazelnut chocolates, bar of mocha chocolate.
In a large bowl, beat the butter until fluffy (about 20-30 seconds). Add honey, maple syrup, egg, and vanilla. Beat until combined.
The engine design was created by another German Engineer by the name of Felix Wankel. The first working prototype of the engine was completed in 1957. While the Wankel (some may know it by the incorrect slang term “rotary”) design is based upon the same 4 cycles it achieves this by a completely different means.
Thanks so much for stopping by today!
Wasting no time, Emerson leaned past the navigator to where Steinman nervously waited.
The Doctor has regenerated into a rather more difficult persona. He and Peri must do battle with a big slug.
Quite different from my Wordpress, I gotta say. I'm feeling disoriented, lol.
Mix in a bowl and refrigerate until ready to use. It goes especially well with puffy tacos or a big ol’ plate of freshly grilled fajitas — like the one below just begging for onions and peppers. Thanks, Robb, for the pointers on making them.
Alexandra Cinque might seem like a typical college student, battling schoolwork and conquering exams—but there’s a lot more fight to her than meets the eye.
I’ve been having a look at some online software tools, several of which are new to me, and which some may find useful.
The Universe will sense your desires. As you take these baby steps and implement these small incremental changes in your life, your energy vibration changes, rises, and begins bringing you in line with your intention of finding peace. As your energy vibration changes, you change, your thoughts, opinions, desires and reactions to the world around you change. The Universe feels the change and changes what is sent to you. You will begin seeing spontaneous circumstances show up which bring you more comfort, calm and peace. This will set in motion a snow ball effect wherein the more peace you feel the more peaceful circumstances will come to you. Peace like all other intentions in life is a journey, not a destination. As we navigate through life in these mortal bodies we learn and gain the feelings, the energy vibrations which ultimately carry us to our Divine Destination.
it's an endless space
I know that sounds silly but I’m sure we all realize the importance of self perception. If I don’t feel I look great, why should anyone else? In that same train on thought, if I don’t appreciate my hair right now, can it ever be appreciated by me or anyone else?
Stars (out of 5): ****
Penguin Island is a little eco-bird santuary island off the coast of Rockingham - a 5 minute ferry ride to be precise. There is a sand bar that connects the island to the Rockingham coastline and some stupid people do try to walk across when the tide is out.... however we value our lives and took the ferry! Even though the sand bar is closed to public access people still walk across it!!!
Melissa hated that this fighting was going on and she didn’t want Denise to hate her so she took every chance she could to talk to Denise alone to show her that she cared for her. Melissa even got her hair cut the way Denise had it cut as a child.
So, here are the current projects on the docket:
farmers and herdsmen resulting
The Gemmell Award nominations were announced, to much frowning (there definitely seemed to be a consensus amongst many present - though not the award organisers to my knowledge - that the award could do with being moved to a juried format), and there was much discussion of the Hugo shortlist, not least the renewed GRRM vs Rowling contest caused by Game of Thrones Season 1 going up against the final Harry Potter move in the Long-form Dramatic Presentation category. Previously, The Goblet of Fire bested A Storm of Swords to the 2001 Best Novel Hugo Award, so it'll be interesting to see how it falls out this year. Otherwise the main topic of interest regarding the Hugos was that the novels on the list were books people had actually heard of, with particular positive surprise over the presence of Leviathan Wakes on the list.
We’re also being told that Sheen’s traveling one-man tantrum show is somehow improving. But no one asks just who are the people making these pronouncements? If they’re dumb enough to purchase a ticket to one of these hideous events they’re probably about as sensible as snails in heat.
How to love an African Man (Satire)
I often pray that God will bless me with the ability to continue to have gratitude for each moment. To not let my mind take over my heart. Because I am extremely blessed and so are so many I know. And my life has been anything but hard...so why do I think it needs to get easier?
Saturday 9 April, The Shed, Burridge, Botley Road - Burridge AFC hosted Drew Smith Southampton Senior League leaders, Netely Central Reserves, who would have sealed the league title with victory on a sunny afternoon in April.
The Orthopedic Foundation for Animals will certify the radiographs of hips and elbows of a breeding dog. The OFA standardizes the process and helps to ensure breeding stock is less likely to pass on this devastating problem to the next generation. Dogs can get OFA-certified after two years of age. Radiographs are sent to the foundation and a certificate is given with a grade from excellent to poor. OFA certificates of both parents with a good or excellent rating is necessary so that the puppies will be less likely to suffer this problem.
The coolness of ones shoreline,
(*And that's if we ignore the "Ob La Di Ob La Da Story" by Jimmy Scott, who coined the phrase in the first place. It's a completely different tune, but certainly milks the topic. It's almost surprising an "Ob La Di Ob La Da" concept album wasn't issued).
Dissecting one of each sample to check payload, I was a little surprised to find both the Rio shells and the S&B standard buck loads carrying exactly the same number and size of pellets. For some reason I had it wedged into my brain that 'reduced recoil' meant lighter payload. In this, it does not. Both shells have nine OO pellets above the wad, although there is significant difference in the wad structure itself.
The "sisters stuff" ALWAYS has fun ideas and creativity way for mom's to stay happy, but I wanted to share there list of 100 things to do with the kids this summer
This is my first post on the Paper Smooches Sparks challenge blog!! And I cannot thank you enough for the wonderful welcome and comments that you left yesterday for the new team!!! THANK YOU!!!
Finally, on January 6th, SEVENTEEN DAYS after losing my account, Microsoft gives it back to me:
Now who can show the moment when
God bless you, and if there is anything I can help you with in your walk with Christ, please feel free to call me at 245-1611 or email me at jddobbs@verizon.net. If you’d like to see the video I spoke of earlier, you can find the link on my blog at www.mrdobbs.org. God bless you, and have a great week!
c) that's all you need. Well for freckle pops you need lollipop sticks or even paddle-pop/craft sticks but that's it.
James Dalton, head of property insurance at the ABI, said:
AVER - American Veterans for Equal Rights
I just finished a week in a school where the boys were admitting that they biggest pressure they faced was from other boys urging them to become sexually active with their date or girlfriend. This was no surprise to me, as “bragging rights” is almost always on top of the list of reasons teens give for having sex.
Well I think it's official, i've been a bit rubbish about keeping this blog up to date - I've got lots of reasons (ok excuses)though, which are;
Instead of the usual stately art-hanging-on-walls approach, Cattelan decided to "hang" all of his art from the Guggenheim's ceiling. A mere gesture of "look-at-me" irreverence, or something more deeply subversive? Considering that much of Cattelan's art has been site-specific in nature, his approach to All suggests an attempt to radically decontextualize his work and allow the viewer to determine how his work stands up by itself.
In response, Eric Schmidt, Executive Chairman of Google spoke quite well about education, growing the middle class and youth unemployment, but it was his own personal feeling that stood out.
So, to make this international, how many contacts would it take to get to your chosen Head of State?
Steps how to create the card:
I used my favourite of the new Waltzingmouse release stamps which co-ordinate with the label die and the matching border to create the background for the large 8x8 card. The colours were from last weeks Colour Throwdown but I wasn't quick enough getting it done to join the challenge. The sentiment is from Imagine That. I made the felt flower by cutting out 3 flowers using a marianne flower die and folding them into 3rds and sticking together for dimension. The 4 is a chipboard letter covered in the same felt as the flower.
Most of the day I’ve flitted around Facebook, reading lovely posts on Trev’s Facebook page, playing The Sims and watching Coronation Street.
When I was growing up I was taught that the fact that we had the largest middle class in the history of the world was evidence that our economic system was working incredibly well.
And Cain sides with the shifty one-percent while he calls the protesters names
“I kept waiting for another shot or for the door to burst open or for…something to happen. But it didn’t. I don’t really know how long we sat there. Time seemed to alternate between taking forever to pass and moving faster than the speed of light.
I nearly forgot to mention a very awesome experience we had on our drive home. Nearing camp we were checking the airstrip to see if we could find Kuhanya but instead we found a herd of Elephant hanging out in the open. As we do not view Elephant at night as we do not shine the light on them we chose to switch off all our lights and radio and sat with them in the pitch dark using our other senses to experience the moment. As our eyes became adjusted to the light we could make out their impressive shapes next to the vehicle and as time passed and they got closer we could make out details on their face but the noises and smells were what made the experience and it will be something that I do more often now as our presence did not interfere in any way and they went about what they were doing as if we were not there. I couldn't think of a better way to finish off the
I attack the querying process with a spreadsheet. It’s seven columns wide, several rows long and must be printed on legal paper. The names of literary agents run down the side of the spreadsheet and the columns are labeled name, address, genre, email, snail mail, submission guidelines, miscellaneous. I approach my queries as I approached the audit workpapers I prepared when I was a tax accountant. I label my spreadsheets, tick and tie addresses I have confirmed, highlight my research with a yellow marker. I wore blue suits and pantyhose in my accountant days. Now I wear Levis with holes in the knees, but I can still format a nice spreadsheet.
I find it so inspiring looking at other people's treasures so I would love it if you would leave a link to this post. Just tell me what is your special treasure this week and we can share with each other.
For years, southerners have laughed at the idea of fine dining in Queensland. This guide will be instrumental in changing that way of thinking and prove that in fact, we have some amazingly talented and passionate food-stars here. And some pretty darn good restaurants.
Additionally, we are strongly encouraging monetary donations. Here are some individual donation sites:
This interpretation is confirmed in Ministry of Healing, p. 422:
3:15 Wiener Races follows Silent Auction - Pre-registration table open till 1:30
The Cybermen chapter contains some amazing facts about the clients of a beach club in Rotterdam and a man called Kevin Warwick who works at the University of Reading. I have heard about this man before - but every time I read about his experiments on himself and his wife (they had microchips implanted into their bodies that were linked to their nervous systems with startling results) I am more and more impressed.
Manufactured in Japan until 1994, the Honda AX 250 has built up a sizable fan base among the earliest off-road enthusiasts. In fact, a grey market version of the original AX 250 is still available in certain parts of Asia, where it is very popular with tourists keen on touring on the less-than-perfect local roads. The AX 250 continues to be a popular used motorcycle in the UK, thanks to the reliable Honda engine and easily available spare parts. With the right maintenance and quality parts, even a decade-old Honda AX 250 can dazzle spectators and thrill off-road riders.
"I can't wait to introduce you to my friends. They'll be here any minute."
Ha! Double Rainbow…Weak Sauce! Check out this Quad Rainbow (No Homo)! Rest Up today and whatever you do, ENJOY!!!
The story goes that the husband showed little or no remorse for his dead wife and in-fact, quickly packed up and left town to return to Kansas without even bothering to claim his poor wife’s body. News of the death spread quickly around the tiny town along with instant suspicion that somehow that woman was the victim of foul play at the hands of her low-life husband and was not in-fact a victim of a suicide alone in a small hotel room hundreds of miles from home.
I just know you're going to love that as well as these sneak peeks at what's going into the new store!
Harvard University and the Massachusetts Institute of Technology on Wednesday announced a new nonprofit partnership, known as edX, to offer free online courses from both universities. Harvard’s involvement follows M.I.T.’s announcement in December that it was starting an open online learning project to be known as MITx. Its first course, Circuits and Electronics, began in March, enrolling about 120,000 students, some 10,000 of whom made it through the recent midterm exam. Those who complete the course will get a certificate of mastery and a grade, but no official credit. Similarly, edX courses will offer a certificate but will carry no credit. (The New York Times)
I hope to take pictures soon of the beautiful green in Texas!! Had lots of rain....so different from the brown of last year. Baby lambs are in abundance in the green wheat field. Spring is in the air and I am itching to dig in the dirt!! :-)
*Don't worry, I'm not spoiling any surprises, this lil' ol' sewing blog doesn't hold a lot of interest for hubby, so I think I'm pretty safe posting this!
4 conditions
"I was not going to let them take me. I was rather going to be shot than dragged off somewhere terrible and raped," she said.
Palm breweries and Rodenbach's Ghequire collaborated with chef
Howdy, been a while , but I’m sure you’re all used to that by now.
This past weekend, my mom and I traveled to Kansas City to visit my sister and brother-in-law. We had a blast! There are so many shops and restaurants up there that we don't have here in Alabama, so of course we shopped 'till we dropped and ate until we about popped. One of the shops we visited was Sur la Table. I now realize that I've been pronouncing the name of the store in my southern American accent instead of French (::blushing::). I walked out of the shop with several knick knacks, and my mom bought a cookie press that we used to make these cheese straws. I've never used a cookie press before, so I was excited to get into the kitchen and learn.
- Model code comes into force immediately
I’m sure we’ll see him again soon. We had tributes to Twin Peaks and Police Academy. And most importantly, the gang finally caught the Yin half of the Yin/Yang killers. What’s next? Will Gus finally get some lovin’?
I am SO tired of traps.
It was agreed, apparently, that we would head to Pearlglen in search of Cassidy’s mentor, another mage and archer. Color me shocked. The town was rescued some years back by a flying snake with feathers posing as an angel of sorts. They were so impressed with the poser that they made a statue in honor of him. I could only hope to be so lucky. It would be a two day trip to the town, hopefully only a couple of hours to find the elf so we can get onto more important matters.
This weekend is Mid South Con in Memphis! I took Friday off from work and have spent the whole weekend doing non-stop gaming! I've had a blast! I don't have many pictures to show you because frankly I was having so much fun that I forgot about taking pictures. LOL
"This particular cartoon of a 'poster' seems to have struck a gigantic nerve, something I was totally unprepared for," she said.
ISBN-13: 978-1468121087
I'm not a fan a traditional fudge. It's just too much for me. Crazy, I know. But I love all the different varieties out there now like my S'mores Fudge (hanging out on the sidebar) or this version. Now that I can handle!
Even with her whimpering she could hear the grinding of blade on stone.
If I am keeping him as my focus, I will be more present for him and be a better mother. And I'll probably even be more relaxed than being tied down to a rigid schedule and I know I'll enjoy him more! It's a win-win.
Chapter 5 - Climate
In the meantime, I'd like to approach the SPLC about having the Republican Party of North Carolina designated as a hate group. They've earned it.
CONCURRENT RESOLUTION
Like any upholstery project, there is something to be said for keeping a soft hand and sort of artfully playing with the fabric. Especially when deciding where to place the button in the fabric and in getting the fabric to fold right. Play with the fabric and it will work with you. It's absolutely begging to sit in a diamond shape if you help it along a little. :)
That's something you have probably already learned about Sweet Daddy.
But the problem goes deeper. While processed sugars may produce a brief emotional high, several lines of evidence indicate that they affect our biology in ways that promote depression. For example, rates of depression in a country rise in lockstep with per capita sugar consumption. Sugars — which are found in all sorts of processed foods we don’t typically think of as sweet — promote obesity, and obesity is a very powerful risk factor for the later development of depression.
Embellishment: Kort&Godt pearls, cheesecloth
1 cup flaked coconut
Without further delay….my personal list, #20 – #11:
Skip ahead to the 27th, so only 2 days, I was laying on the couch at about 10:30pm when I started having severe rib pain. When I say severe I mean tears pouring down my face, doubled up in a ball, wanting to die P-A-I-N! I did everything I could to lessen the pain and it did ease but not much so I paged my doctor. I seriously thought it was anxiety because it kind of felt like what I have heard a panic attack feels like. When talking to my doctor we decided to keep my appointment the next morning unless a few things happened in the night, of which he told me to watch for. Well I made it through the night and got sleep but woke up extremely nauseous at 3:30 and vomited which made me feel better. I got to the doctor at 10 the next morning and he did a U/S and found that I had a 15% abruption. Thank GOD I have the doctor I have because I didn't have any concrete signs of an abruption but because he knew me, he knew something was wrong. We talked about our options and I chose to try to wait 24-48 hours and have the steroid injections for her lungs, because now I was just 34 weeks. My doctor wanted to discuss this with the neonatologist before he approved it but said we were of course going to be admitted right away. While taking me over to the hospital he told me that they were not going to wait but do the c-section in the next few hours, which actually turned into 30 minutes, because I was contracting when they hooked me to the monitors. So our baby Isabella was born at 11:35am on Thursday January 28, 2010 weighing 5 pounds and 18 inches long. When she came out her Daddy and I both had to double check that she was really a girl! I was so anxious, but when I heard that sweet cry, there was nothing like it, such sweet relief!
I will hold you together even when you feel it is broken beyond repair
Sure, I have covered the financial sector for almost 25 years, but even I have had my fair share of hits and misses among my investments.
For sake of all the seeds unborn.
True religious affections are balanced in their nature. Edwards grants that such balance and symmetry will not be perfect in the Christian, but the true exercise of the affections in God’s will lend the Christian to a balance. Hosea 7:8 helpfully illustrates this by describing “Ephraim” as “a cake not turned.” In other words, they were only half-baked. Edwards commonly comments on the imbalanced and subtly counterfeit nature of false religion. There are often aspects of external piety and talk in false religion, but in the affections themselves there are gross imbalances.[10]
I've yet to sit down and add reviews for various hotels, attractions and restaurants to Tripadvisor.com, but when I do so, there is a small restaurant in Florence that will be getting an excellent report from me.
Jonathan Slater, Plattsburgh State University of New York. Two Solitudes in the Global Village
Since Chris & I are getting married this year we have agreed to not spend a lot on each other during holidays, etc. He decided to break this rule at Christmas & got me an iPad though. I couldn't tell him to return it haha. I love that thing! It was kind of an exception though because it was also my gift from his family.
I would make a card for her daughter.
Helpful to me was reading things other folks had written about their unschooling journey. I've always been one of those folks who thinks that if someone else can do it, so can I. I particularly recall reading an article entitled, I Can Breathe Again—My Children Finally Learned to Read by Carol Rice-McClure, and that article was very, very calming for me. It may have helped that one of her kids was named Liam, and he didn't acquire reading until he was 16.
Your kind and considerate prole, Unsavouryandgrouse.
(Bit fretful of further damage to my arsehole it seems.)
K﻿
Dahlings, as those of you in the UK know only too well, it has been raining and raining here. A Lot.
F*#king morons. Yeah,—— vote Santorum. If you want to regress a hundred years in the blink of an eye.
Children have a way of making everything seem right. Even with mischievous smirks and remarks, they somehow make you right again. I will miss every moment spent with those kids and I intend to continue volunteering there next semester – it was the one thing I really looked forward to every week and it was the one thing that make every worry dissipate.
Sx
Neither of us was particularly rebellious, but both of us were desperate for the attention that our parents now showered upon one another.
and it often has something to do with who, what, where, when and how,
From the Wall Street Jornal:
I think there is a couple of ways to look at guys stepping up their game. Either be inspired by it or give up. I have always chosen to be inspired.
Workers who have to take time off work because of stress…anxiety…or a related disorder…will be off the job an average of 20 days out of the year…
This amount must be paid in full ( to a corporate trust fund) at the time that the
“His sickness impacts his ability to get work. This case, especially his wife filling for divorce, has put him on a binge that I have never seen before. He is extremely hurt and extremely sick. He is often unable to obtain work because of this sickness. And his sickness is getting increasingly worse”================ In other words he is a pathetic weakling who chooses to pour alcohol down his throat instead of manning up and looking after the children he created. Then has the nerve to present his weakness as “sickness”. Sickness is something like cancer – not overdoing the sauce, which is alcohol addiction, which is behavioural, not a disease.
Let go of all of the things that won't matter down the road. The unimportant things that take you away from your kids. Let go of the idea of having a sparkling clean house. Let go of the idea that every meal needs to be picture-perfect. Cling to the things that will always matter. Invest your time in being attentive to your kids. It will not be time wasted.
Alexa had a great birthday…her words not mine LOL. Thank you to all for her lovely birthday wishes! She got a new iPhone as her big prezzie…she’s wanted one for years but I finally decided she was mature/responsible enough for one this year LOL. Don’t get me started on how many phones she’s ruined over the past few years…dropped in toilets…dropped on ground…etc. So she better love this phone like its her best baby cuz if its ruined Momma is not buying her a new one. Also with age 16 means she is now allowed to date…oyyyy..not so thrilled with that one I must say. And the boys must meet my very strict approval rules or it’s a no-go…that’s how this momma rolls. They aren’t scared of her dad…but they are skeered of me hahahaha…just the way I like it!! Ok you all have a fabby weekend and I’ll see you back here on Monday ok!
Got this one off ebay, for around $25 -$30 or so, it was a fair time back so I forget exactly.
“Of course they do. All I want is for them not to mess with me, and I won’t mess with them. They must leave us alone; let us practice our own culture. But the Boer and the blacks are like oil and water: we just can’t mix.”
It's clear that this clever and glamorous cohesion of talent and shameless honesty is exactly what will take Dragonette beyond the realms of any hipster hyped about band (even though they have all the right factors that equate to any partygoer’s dream night out) and carry them into the mainstream superstar arena through out 2009.
Dark Moon picks up where Changeling finished with Trey and Alexa undertaking a mission to retrieve an object that has the ability to save Lucien's life. There is also a dastardly sub-plot that involves a demon so ghastly that I couldn't even begin to go into it here. It's great fun and I hope that the fans of Changeling will love it just as much as the first book.
You can choose from some of their designs and just add one of your photo's, or choose one of their designs and add your own words, or choose one of their designs and add both a photo and your words. The words you add can be short or multiple paragraphs depending on the format you choose. There are six different formats for personalizing your card depending upon where you want your photo and words to appear.
Then there's loose ends..
Black mittens from O’Neill, because I have gloves now and I want mittens
“O Sanctissima O Piissima
be the middle years full of self-denial,
As such, neither casually snapping tourists nor enthusiastic photographers need worry about being sued for copyright infringement if they happen to take a photograph of a bus in front of Parliament. HHJ Birss found here that the claimants had a photograph with identifiable specific original features; as he explains at paragraphs 51 to 54 there are particular elements of composition and visual processing that he found to be original in that image. On that basis, given that it was clear from the facts that the defendant had set out to recreate the claimant's image there was a clear causal link between the two and the original elements of the first image had been reproduced in the second. The defendant's image thus infringed copyright in the claimant's.
24. Being forgiving and gracious when I am late.
or manifest in some goddamn way
Sassoon’s works include the geometric perm and the “Nancy Kwan” hairstyles. They were all modern and low-maintenance. The hairstyles created by Sassoon relied on dark, straight, and shiny hair cut into geometric yet organic shapes. In 1963, Sassoon created a short, angular hairstyle cut on a horizontal plane that was the recreation of the classic “bob cut.” His geometric haircuts seemed to be severely cut, but were entirely lacquer-free, relying on the natural shine of the hair for effect. Sassoon has been a key force in the commercial direction of hair styling. His Vidal Sassoon brand was applied to shampoos and conditioners sold worldwide, with a commercial campaign featuring the iconic slogan “If you don’t look good, we don’t look good.” Former salon colleagues also bought Sassoon’s salons and acquired the right to use his name, extending the brand in salons into the United Kingdom and the United States.
books, including the best-selling book, The House of Dimon (a profile of
The symphony is clearly indebted to Beethoven’s predecessors, particularly his teacher Joseph Haydn as well as Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart, but nonetheless has characteristics that mark it uniquely as Beethoven’s work, notably the frequent use of sforzandi and the prominent, more independent use of wind instruments. Sketches for the finale are found among the exercises Beethoven wrote while studying counterpoint under Johann Georg Albrechtsberger in the spring of 1795.
The sports world would also announce the return of Tiger Woods at the PGA US tour and wishes him luck, but to also keep your eye on your favorite sports/teams for more news and analysis.
On pages such as this one, they claim that writers will “earn 70% on your sales when priced at $2.99 or higher on all channels.” This is an extremely disingenuous claim, as it is not 70% of your cover price, but 70% of the money Book Country receive from retailers.
Families should talk more.
Apparently the Liebster Blog award is to be passed on to blogs with fewer than 200 followers. Perhaps this is what's stoking my ennui this evening because the fact that I fall into that category makes me a tad sad. I've been at this for more than a year now, and it seems like any momentum I might have had has stalled. And every time I look over and see that Networked Blogs widget with my own little icon as my one follower, I get a little more glum. I only decided a couple of weeks ago to put that on my blog space, and I don't know what else to do but have it sit there waiting for some action, but it still reeks of desperation, doesn't it?
Upon awakening and having removed myself from the entanglement of legs and corsetry, I made my way to the chosen duelling ground and waited for my accuser. Arrived with my second and surgeon, as did my opponent. Having agreed on swords, we set about settling our argument. A surprisingly nimble gentleman and well trained in the art. NOTE: But not nearly nimble enough. Still feeling the loss of the Lady of the Fans, I took out my lamenting ennui upon my accuser.
True story: I love to bake. Truer story: I worry myself into a panic about whether or not I’m “healthy,” whatever that means. This sometimes means I think twice about making, say, a yellow cake with chocolate icing or a big pan of funfetti anything. But what about a “healthy” baked good? That’s okay, right? Like, if there’s fruit or a vegetable in something that basically cancels out the sugar and flour and butter…I’m pretty sure. Oatmeal raisin cookies are like eating oatmeal, banana bread is good for you, and zucchini bread counts as one of my 5-a-days. Don’t try to tell me otherwise, because I’m not listening.
Oventray.
Now I so carefully the post! Only like that on the TV Must be acceptables? Then it drose. So rat like animal for car insurance picture cel;ebrates supposedly the CHINESE NEW YEAR!!!!!
Well – I see that I didn’t post stats last month for March. Sorry about that – a combination of being busy promoting my novel as well as getting together with some of the other BBTI guys to do some fun shooting (and to try out a .460 Rowland conversion kit for a Glock 21!).
I hope you will get outside soon and eat your lunch in the spring sunshine. It's such a small thing to lift your spirits in the mundane routine of life. Be sure to snap a few photos and use them to record your feelings about Spring.
While that was cooking, I set up my pot with a dash of salt and a drop of EVOO to keep the noodles from sticking. I set the temp at 5 and waited for it to boil. And waited. And waited some more. I increased the temp to 6 and finally the water started to boil. I added the spaghetti and turned the whole spaghetti thing over to my wife. She does pasta better than me. It cooked for approximately 7 minutes until noodles were tender.
Each poet’s selection opens with a short essay giving some background, setting them briefly in ideological and historical context and how they might relate to their peers. The essays are garnered from sources as wide as literary journals, radio interviews etc. and the scholarly footnotes look as though they would be well worth following up in some cases. The more recent poets’ essays suffer slightly from being written more than three years ago, in some cases. Peter Sirr is quoted as still being editor of the journal Poetry Ireland, and Sinead Morrissey’s essay focuses a great deal on her career pre-2002, neglecting to mention her 2007 UK National Poetry Winner, ‘Through the Square Window’, although by some recompense the poem is the last included. This would suggest compilation taking place prior to 2006/07 and the intervening years spent on collation and editing.
Tuesday, October 13, 2009
Relationships!
Andrea Kuhn Boeshaar is a certified Christian life coach; a popular speaker at writers’ conferences, workshops, and women’s groups; and the author of numerous published books, including the Seasons of Redemption series: Unwilling Warrior, Uncertain Heart, Unexpected Love, and Undaunted Faith.
Today I Remember I have been gifted with a special talent that only I possess. I Remember to use my gift to bless myself and others. I Remember I Am a blessing and live my life reflecting that out to the Universe. I send thoughts of blessings on the path I am walking today.
BB11 – 3.1 million (average)
But more than that, it is organised compassion. Most of us - Tory councillors evidently excepted - do not want to live in a place where people suffer for lack of any simple and cheap remedy. This is why previous generations of workers agitated and voted for the welfare state to come into existence. It was working people actively saying they do not want the unemployed to be punished for their predicament.
However, take the case of Michael Behe’s proposal, and one can see that proposing intelligent design acts by implication as a super-natural explanation. Of course, it is logically possible for an intelligent design inference to be a natural explanation (for instance by proposing something like directed panspermia). Here, one might think the question is pushed back, but that’s not necessarily the case, as it is logically possible for some evolutionary pathway to higher organisms to not include any steps which might produce composites which qualify as irreducibly complex. One can propose the intelligent design theory, therefore, scientifically, without committing oneself to what the ‘actual’ cause of the intelligent design is insofar as science is concerned (though they may be tempted, as they should, to suppose that God did it). Notice that Michael Behe’s proposal is empirically verifiable, which is to say falsifiable. One only has to posit a better explanation for how the apparently irreducibly complex machine could plausibly have evolved in a series of gradual successive steps. Some people recognize this falsifiability, and actually propose that it is theologically dangerous, since it represents a ‘God of the gaps’ fallacy (though that isn’t actually a fallacy) – opponents of intelligent design seem oblivious to the fact that they substitute a “Naturalism of the gaps” hypothesis, whereby they argue that even if they don’t have an explanation (meaning a naturalistic one) today, they will someday find it. That sounds very weak to me, and indeed is the kind of answer one often confronts in debates about the resurrection of Christ. Behe’s proposal is divisive not because it isn’t empirical, but because it tries to import God into science.
What a privilege to carry everything to God in prayer!
Link has expired.
So, thanks mate, you saved me from. . . well, you know. . .
Blink, blink ,wink wink as my eyes strain to see past the light from the door , if I can make it, if I could just make it I’d be free if I could just get past the door.
When: Saturday, October 15, 2005 - Noon - 8:00pm and Sunday, October 16, 2005 - Noon - 6:00pm
anyway, i remember always getting excited about purchasing new school supplies each school year. the night before school would start, i’d thoughtfully pack my writing utensils and small–but totally necessary–odds-and-ends in a colorful pencil box, organize and distinguish my lisa frank folders for each subject, and then carefully pack them away in my backpack until they made their debut the following day.
A few weeks ago, Josh's Mom, Sisters and I, hosted a baby shower for Karen and Baby Charlie (Welcome, Charlie!)
So, I have a giant lemonade, and have grounded myself to the computer to get these photos edited!
Now, don’t forget that we have only explored 5% of all our oceans. We really do not know what is down there….
Can rid your fears dry all your tears
This will be my last post for now. I hope to be back posting as an independent, free woman as soon I am settled in my new home. I’m not exactly sure where I’ll end up but I’m sure my instinct will show me the way. I know everything will eventually workout for the best. However, I certainly could use and appreciate any prayers and good wishes you can send my way… Thank you everyone for all your kindness, support and comments about my work. You have been a great source of comfort and encouragement for me during this difficult time. If you have questions or concerns, please contact me at emilygoochphotos@yahoo.com however, with limited Internet access; it might take me a while to get back to you. Take care…
AAWR has been contacted today concerning this story, the anonymous individual pointing out that the race of the offender/offenders is not known, they further point out that the investigation centres around the social networking site Facebook and that she may have known her killer/killers. It must be made clear here that AAWR laments the death of Anika Smit regardless of the killer/killers ethnic origin; it is for the authorities to determine the identity of the murder/murderers and not of this site. Certainly there is an ongoing ethnic cleansing occurring against whites in South Africa and as such the tragic death of Anika Smit may be a symptom of it ,however this may indeed not be the case, in any event AAWR is a nationalist site and as such opposes and contests all those who would prey upon the innocent, regardless of race.
It is finally snowing in Chicago, it has been snowing since 11:00 a.m. today, right now it is 4:30 p.m. On days like this I wish I was a bear so I could be hibernating in my cozy, warm cave with my cozy, warm, fur coat on. But since I am not a bear, on days like this I knit, or bake "Bocado de Reina", or have a tea party with the girls, or sneak a little nap while they play. My dear other half is home today too, I love that!
Editing is allowed, but think about projects with no dialogue – unless it is voice over of recorded separately. The on board microphones are covered up in a plastic housing.
I work "on" my business. I do not work "in" my business.
Leighanna Light
Dance me through the curtains that our kisses have outworn
-.Iceland 169
- Study what I am interested in – I have researched possible Psychological courses for the autumn this year.
Nothing works. Not even informing them that I am a leading member of the pc brigade and can have them thrown in prison for expressing un -pc views. I can't do any such thing and I've never met this pc brigade that persecutes Daily Mail readers so. It's desperation that makes me say these things. And so I stand flecked with someone else's spittle wishing the longest hard luck story in living memory would just end.
I spend time regularly hanging around the City with my friends because that is how we socialise – we don’t want to hang around the house all day. The police stopped my friends and I which I find irritating. Two of my friends were stopped and searched by an a member of the Gardaí who was rude and aggressive when they were doing nothing wrong. I have been stopped and searched twice and asked questions four or five times. Its so ridiculous. Would they do that to an average 40 year old man walking down the street and treat them in the same manor? Hell no, because that person would go straight to the Head Office and report them for mistreatment, however if a teenager reported this sadly no one would believe them.
How do you all regular folks get it done?
1. Amari and Vermouth. Think of amari, like Cynar, Averna, and—on the newer and weirder end—Bitter Truth’s EXR, as cocktails in a bottle. They’re so full of flavor and so good, why not promote them alongside the listed cocktails as alternatives to cocktails? When the typical tippler visits a bar, he or she gets sucked into the menu the same way a museum-goer gets distracted by the placard next to the paintings: you get the impression that this is the enforced way to read the experience. Ordering off the menu or pointing to a bottle feels uncouth, and you’re afraid to ask how much it costs. So put more stuff on the menu.
Celebrate
With President Obama trying to employ the power of the presidency to force an agreement, House and Senate leaders said votes could occur as early as Wednesday on competing proposals to slash spending in exchange for increasing federal borrowing authority that the Treasury Department says will be exhausted Aug. 2, raising the prospect that federal bills will go unpaid.
“This project does not pass a balancing test because it is so full of loopholes and ways for a terrorist to avoid being searched that it simply makes no sense,” said the flyers.
North Korea’s rocket launch was postponed Thursday due to bad weather. Kim Jong-un admitted he didn’t expect the unfavorable weather condition. Embarrassed, a furious Kim fired weather bureau chief, Prisconilo Yong-nam.
-Shows that God is both knowable and personal; has both a loving and just nature that must be reconciled together.
The whip antenna on the phone extended to a length of about 9 cm, which is about ¼ of the wavelength of an electromagnetic wave at 835MHz.
Lord willing, more before the end of the week on the question, What will happen once I die?
Dove sent us a wonderful, huge heart if you will recall that we revealed two Saturdays ago. Today we want to look at another new product from Dove for Valentine's Day that they sent to us to review. This is the "Dark Chocolate & Cherry Swirl" Heart PROMISES that you may still be able to find in your local stores. But before you run out, take a few minutes and read our full sensory review.
so much more, Lord?
Whenever I see my grandma, and also some of my other older relatives, they ask about Henry and such. Then they ask if he's still feeding well, and if there's still enough milk for him. Totally reasonable questions, but it makes me feel a little bit weird, as in my head they are basically asking how my boobs are. And I reply, yes, my boobs are fine, thank you. I don't want to deny anyone the right to know how my boobs are. Boobs.
The bottom line is that no NFL coach has a crystal ball. They can only do what they think is best at the time. Sometimes things work out and sometimes they don’t. That’s why it’s called a game people!
The show isn’t the same without Michael, but it’s still one of the best shows on TV. James Spader is hilarious as the new CEO, Robert California. If you don’t watch The Office already, I would highly recommend you start!
F: We had a chat and then the manager decided to give me the job. They didn’t actually want another girl, but because Poly and I hit it off , that was it. I got the job and I was in the band. The band happened very quickly. It was all about the right time and the right place and the right color, the right song.
Every time I have the opportunity to observe in a Primary classroom, generally via the role as consultant, I notice several children who appear to be wandering aimlessly. These children are classic examples of the second year student who is usually 4+ years old. As they stroll through the classroom, they glide their hands along the edges of shelves occasionally stopping to briefly manipulate a decorative object and then continue on with a casual demeanor.
I need a vacation – previous experience required.
Using a largish spoon, drop big spoonfuls of the batter very carefully into the hot oil. Don't worry if they are not the perfect rounded shapes, they will taste really good either way!
Bran, oat and wheat*
Texas – Another state that finds itself chronicled in song, Texas has been source material for songwriters since it first claimed independence from Mexico. However, this time we are going with anything remotely Country & Western. We are going with Chris Rea, one of my favorite singers from the 1980s, and his recording of “Texas”.
The ref Lee Mason really messed up because Saha was miles offside. Arsenal were the only team that had not conceded a league goal in 2011. Breaking such a nice record with an offside goal wasn’t pleasing to the eye.
I know I butchered that, sorry. Still the point remains. And the point is that most often, criminals do something to help someone else, except when said criminals do, in fact, have sick minds. The fact that they are helping someone to do something or get something outside the law doesn’t matter. In the end people who do good are often doing it for themselves only, and in the end people who do bad are doing it for themselves as well it’s just a matter of where they are on the law-abiding scale.
Rock and roll used to be fun and fairly innocent. It was often about love, such as when Buddy Holly sang "Peggy Sue," or when Jerry Lee Lewis performed "Great Balls of Fire." Or it was just about having fun such as when Chubby Checker had us doing "The Twist" and Ritchie Valens was teaching us how to sing in Spanish with "La Bamba." The most sexually provocative song out was "Louie Louie" by The Kingsman. I have no idea why as the lyrics are basically unintelligible, but that's how the story goes.
The Horned One is said to have complete control over human sexuality and to know all Natural Sciences. It is for these reasons that sorcerers are most likely to summon him. He will cause any person to fall in lust with any other, and he is known to aid desperate men and women in fulfilling all manner of perversions and turpitudes otherwise impossible in a Lawful universe. He will also instruct witches and wizards in the construction of tinctures, tonics, and toxins of various sorts. The price for these services goes beyond the summoner's soul, as they must also yield to the beast's insatiable sexual desires. Unfortunately for many, this part of the bargain is revealed all too late.
“Team Two, retrieve their weapons,” the man issued the command like he was used to people responding quickly when he told them to do something.
There's NO way it's that time again! Time for the blog carnival brainchild of MckMama -- the ultimate fesser upper and chance to blow off some steam, confess some sins, and bask in the humor, solidarity, and universal nature of imperfections.
Say what!? We didn't have to pay as much as we thought in taxes!? Thank you 3rd child exemption - Jesus is Lord! Fried Pies... that's right... 49 cents.
To seal and mildly antique this piece I have applied two kinds of paste wax, buffed to a soft, satin sheen.
Anyway, I have come across mothers like the Dance Moms at the gym where the girls I nanny for do gymnastics. They are the Gym Moms! Yesterday I was appalled by three things I heard.
3. Then take one of your tortillas and spread the cucumber cream cheese over it. I didn’t do a super thick layer, but that was because these will be rolled and I didn’t want cream cheese coming out the ends. Then layer your turkey over it.
I miss the musical jingle of the ice cream truck. When I was a child it would come down our block playing its merry tune and all the kids in the neighborhood would suddenly stop blowing bubbles and appear in the street.
It’s been a while (two days, about) since I last made a normal, uncategorized post, and I figured that the start of the month would be a great way to segue into it.
Combine the first 3 ingredients in a medium bowl. Spread cheese mixture over pizza crust, leaving a 1/2-inch border around the edge. Sprinkle with basil and next 6 ingredients (basil through garlic powder). Arrange plum tomato slices in a single layer on top. Place pizza on baking sheet. Bake at 425° for 10 minutes. Remove pizza to cutting board; cut into 6 slices.
Mission accomplished!
Paper: PTI vintage cream, scarlet jewel, crumb cake, Lily Bee Designs DP
Ging Kalpapruek in Siam Paragon is the first restaurant we went in Bangkok. We decided to go to Siam Paragon Bangkok, which is an upscale shopping mall and one of the biggest shopping centers in Asia, because we didn’t have the time to research where to go, and I thought that going to Siam Paragon would be the easiest as many restaurants would be in one floor and we would have many choices. We also got to check out this beautiful shopping mall. There was an ample choice of restaurants at Siam Paragon in Bangkok and you will enjoy browsing. There were a ton of people even on Tuesday night, the area was very lively and the food court and restaurant section had so many food stalls and it was like a food amusement park. Ging Kalpapruek is a Thai restaurant which offers variety of Thai food and we all enjoyed our meal.
“This is not a death penalty case,” Mackenzie said. “We will do whatever is necessary to defend Casey Anthony from the state trying to take her life.”
An upstairs, interior room is preferable since many chemical hazards are heavier than air and travel along the ground. Choose a single room large enough to hold air for all members of your family. Include pets as well. A full-size dog uses twice as much air as an adult and cats use half the air. To determine air needs and occupancy, have everyone in the room stand with outstretched arms. If they can do this without touching anyone else’s outstretched arms there is enough air for one hour. An 8 foot by 6 foot typical bathroom holds enough air for 2 adults and a child under 6 years of age for one hour.
Somewhere between the struggle with the past and the present sleep took over and a calmness enveloped me.
I once heard a news report which stated that as gas prices go up, it’s a sure sign that the economy is getting better. I have no reason to dispute this, but it just doesn’t make sense to me. If the economy was getting better, wouldn’t the prices go down?
Sure I could paint it a lighter color, but the number of painted pieces in this room is starting to add up and I prefer a mix of natural, upholstered and painted pieces in a room. I know I want something airy to balance the weight of the heavy pieces, and I'm leaning towards a round shape since most of the furniture has such straight lines.
But finally daddy took all he could take. He threw down the cream can and said "do it yourself old woman and the whole batch you can make".
He paused. “I said ‘Good morning’, Mr Badman.”
I recently rewatched an episode of ESPN’s “Outside the Lines” from 2009 featuring an interview with former Chicago Bears quarterback and ’85 Super Bowl Champion Jim McMahon. In the interview, McMahon explained that effects of concussions sustained in his playing career were now affecting his everyday life, including walking into a room in his house and not remembering why. Playing through pain is a source of pride for football players, but McMahon now says that the players were not informed of the potential consequences of repeated head injuries. Other high-profile players have admirably come forward and admitted similar things, including Tony Dorsett and Terry Bradshaw. It’s scary to contemplate what it would be like to be lost in your own brain, caught in a violent maelstrom of confusion and uncertainty. Maybe the mind becomes a disjointed collage of past memories that don’t fit together as they should. Maybe it would be like waking up from a dream that you desperately want to remember but can’t. Maybe it’s much worse.
I am finding more organizations who are promoting women in politics. It should be imperative for women of all ages, colors and classes to increase the awareness of women in the political process and support women for election to public office. Political Party Affiliation does not matter as well…. Regardless of party affiliation, congressional women deliver more federal projects to their home districts and sponsor and co-sponsor more legislation than their male colleagues. In a study that was recently published in The American Journal of Political Science, researchers from Stanford University and the University of Chicago attributed women’s political success not to some innate political instinct but to the fact that it’s really hard for us to get elected (there are currently 360 men and 75 women in the House; 83 men and 17 women in the Senate). They theorize that women feel immense pressure to measure up, so instead of meeting expectations, we surpass them.
In fact, the whole of this episode pays homage to literature in ways that most other TV shows wouldn’t dare. While watching, there are elements of not only McCann, but Kurt Vonnegut, Ken Kesey, Christopher Isherwood, and Richard Yates. There are also other media thrown in too. The image of Don alone at the Howard Johnson’s is something straight out of Edward Hopper, and the drug sequence of Sterling reminded me uncannily of Buffy‘s excellent dream episode, “Restless.” All of this combines to make this episode so much more than slot in a television season. It’s visual art; it’s television at its best.
Holy animosity, Batman! In one of the more unexpected blog posts I’ve read lately, agent Betsy Lerner took aim at people she hates: namely, literary agents. Including (it seems) herself!
Hello out there! Wanted to share another quick and simple and cheap card using dollar bin finds at Michaels.
I’d also like to point out that American Catholics aren’t alone in their language woes. Based on my casual reading, Nabbish, as described by Anthony Esolen in his First Things rant, looks to be a close relative of Nivish, the secret official language of the New International Version.
Celebrate that, today.
I created the sentiment(s) in InDesign using the font FunkyFresh and a blue/green gradient. Both are cut/embossed in my Big Shot using Spellbinders dies.The sentiment on front, the paper-pieced globe, and the background DP (you know it's Echo Park!) are embossed with Sizzix folders.
My face is suffused in warmth
and helps me find a way to bring dream and reality together.
* "AOL and Microsoft: Patent Strategy Ain't What It Used To Be", here. A controversial post by Neil on the mass acquisition of patents and the role of the patent portfolio once it leaves the hands of its original owner.
~ Henry David Thoreau
This book is definitely different to the other books, and has quite a lot of graphical images in it.
Please excuse any blurry photos. I just bought a new camera and I'm trying to get used to it. (It's very hard going from Donna's professional camera to my cheapy version.) I started out with basic kraft paper and layered it on top of plain red cardstock paper. I went around the edges with Tim Holtz's Vintage Photo distress ink to give it a worn look. It gave me a double bonus because in some areas it looks like extra shadows.
“Assad’s troops have heavy weaponry — tanks, artillery — but we are short of weapons. We have nothing to fight with. Assad isn’t quitting because of the strength of his weaponry.”
Sunday is my day to lounge in bed until 10:30, then I putter around the house foraging for an interesting breakfast. The usual breakfast of oat groats, nuts and dry fruits filled my belly, while I observed the garden and fed the hungry back-yard birds.
-James Joyce
Oh you had all asked why Wayne put the empty tampon box on the hutch.
For the purposes of this book review, I won’t explain here, but instead, direct those interested in how the figures really break down to this article I wrote, and what the more accurate amount of self-published titles was in 2009.
With ice cold hands takin' hold of me
Does this sound absolutely delicious to anyone else? Most people I mention this to seem to scrunch their faces up in disgust. I don't know about the "lager style" of which I have to assume they are talking about light lager. With the light lager insinuation aside, there is something about beer, ham, cheese, and waffles just gets me all excited. I haven't made this recipe yet but I will most definitely not use a light lager, I was thinking more along the lines of wheat beer or maybe go full on adventurous and make a half a batch of stout waffles. Now that's what I'm talking about. Anyone have a waffle iron for sale?
Darklord aged in Pappy Van Winkle 23 year barrels
I am a wife. You are my creation.
Four + Brewing Co Salt Lake City Wildfire Organic Extra Pale Ale
Perfect for garden, tea, beach, or any parties.
Akumal = Place of the turtle in Mayan
We used bulletin board paper in a variety of colors for the students to wrap their tiles. I worked with 2 students at a time. Students were able to decorate their wrapping paper and then bring back their tile to us until the end of the day. We stressed being careful with the tile because if it fell, it may break and there was nothing we could do to fix it. Fortunately at the time we sent them home, we did not have any tiles break!!
Grated Cheese
Appenzeller cheese is produced in Northeast Switzerland. It is made from cow’s milk and is a hard cheese. An herbal brine is applied to cheese during curing to promote the rind. There are 75 dairies producing Appenzeller. This is a pretty good photo because it shows the small holes and the golden rind. It smells strong but it does not taste as strong as it smells. It melts nicely on the tongue and is smooth. It had taste characteristics similar to the Mont Vully. It was mildly salty, earthy, nutty and lightly fruity. I could not decide if I preferred the Appenzeller or the Mont Vully. They are a bit different but I liked them both in a way I find hard to describe.
I believe we lose immortality because we have not conquered our opposition to death; we keep insisting on the primary rudimentary idea: that the whole body should be kept alive. We should seek to preserve only the part that has to do with consciousness.
They were decadently good and we indulged in this little snack several times over the next few weeks, subbing in cream cheese and basil and rosemary, when the goat cheese ran out and we wanted a different herb flavor. They are also terrific with a little fresh marinara on the side.
Be blessed and know God loves the Sinner but not the Sin!
As usual, comment on this post when you join the Developer Blog Banter and I’ll add your response below
I left for a while. Okay, a long while. Things were busy. Things were *mostly* good. We began homeschooling and BB is thriving. We took a trip. Dogs are doing well.
The Desiring God blog shares 15 Tips on Blogging from John Newton. Perhaps you recognize John Newton as the writer of Amazing Grace. Did he really offer tips on blogging, 400 years ago? In a manner of speaking.
My sister was named for the Seminoles' famous warrior and freedom fighter, War Chief Osceola, who, legend has it, said, at a time when General Jessup was upon them, and all seemed lost:
Now we can expand chess to the library!
When you are signed in to blogger at the top right of your screen you should see DESIGN.
As always, I welcome any and all comments about this review. Do you agree with my thoughts about the entire Mortal Instruments series? Let me know.
Genesee County Treasurer Daniel Kildee said today that Limbaugh relied on bad information in making his comments about the idea of shrinking the city.
The ugly: the tiramisu cake I made yesterday for this month's Cake Slice pick. You'll see what I mean on Friday.
5. What’s your favourite colour? Has it always been your favourite?
The communication tools that connect you all now are all but free as well. The Skype offices have big screens that are ON all the time – so you can look up and call out to a colleague in another city as if she was in the next room – for free!
I was scared to ask, but unfortunately he didn't wait to be asked.
It wasn’t a stretch for me to recognize that government also had this success/fail feedback problem.
At another building near the tour bus terminal is a larger exhibit room dedicated to Star Trek: The Next Generation, as well as Star Trek: Deep Space Nine and Star Trek: Voyager. This exhibit displays a mock-up of the Reman Scorpion fighter craft seen in Star Trek: Nemesis and partial recreations of the Enterprise D’s sickbay and engine room. There are models, numerous props and costumes worn and used by the actors and a Klingon chair that you can sit on (there are also captain chairs from the Enterprise B and D but those are roped off). Additionally one side of the exhibit’s wall has a mural with a detailed timeline of NASA and Trek history. The opposing wall displays the costumes. A nice touch to this exhibit were two actors dressed as Vulcans from the far future who stayed in character and interacted with visitors. The uniforms they wore were the ones worn by 29th century Starfleet officers as seen in the Voyager episode “Relativity.”
To the company store
Roger scowled. Beatrice grimaced.
“As a journalist, my instinct tells me that the muffin story was just a bit too good to be true,” says Pexton. As it turns out, the entire cost for refreshments at the meeting was $14.72 per person per day, within federal guidelines. Why the false report, which media outlets failed to check with the Hilton hotel involved? Because the hotel’s were imprecise: coffee and fruit were provided free, and all fees were allocated to the muffins, croissants, bagels, brownies, ,and cookies provided for morning and afternoon refreshment.
We have been having problems with a laptop I invested in on Good Friday!!
and struck up a friendship almost immediately...
If not even having black Republicans criticize the black welfare mentality is acceptable, there is nothing that Republicans can do to attract blacks, while remaining recognizably Republican. And imitating Democrats hasn’t worked, because black voters will always prefer real Democrats to imitators.
New Delhi, the 19th March, 2012
Do you like Phil Collins? I've been a big Genesis fan ever since the release of their 1980 album, Duke. Before that, I really didn't understand any of their work. Too artsy, too intellectual. It was on Duke where Phil Collins' presence became more apparent. I think Invisible Touch was the group's undisputed masterpiece. It's an epic meditation on intangibility. At the same time, it deepens and enriches the meaning of the preceding three albums. Christy, take off your robe. Listen to the brilliant ensemble playing of Banks, Collins and Rutherford. You can practically hear every nuance of every instrument. Sabrina, remove your dress. In terms of lyrical craftsmanship, the sheer songwriting, this album hits a new peak of professionalism. Sabrina, why don't you, uh, dance a little. Take the lyrics to Land of Confusion. In this song, Phil Collins addresses the problems of abusive political authority. In Too Deep is the most moving pop song of the 1980s, about monogamy and commitment. The song is extremely uplifting. Their lyrics are as positive and affirmative as anything I've heard in Rock. Christy, get down on your knees so Sabrina can... Phil Collins' solo career seems to be more commercial and therefore more satisfying, in a narrower way. Especially songs like In the Air Tonight and Against All Odds. Sabrina, don't just stare at it... But I also think Phil Collins works best within the confines of the group, than as a solo artist, and I stress the word artist. This is Sussudio, a great, great song, a personal favorite.
"The electricity landlords are the ones that make the illegal connections on the poles and they make sure that they disconnect the electricity by taking the wires off the pole every morning," said a resident.
According to the unnamed Lancashire Evening Post reporter, the fact Richardson believes in God is something that bewildered and astounded the world of football, as if it’s something so freak and out there that it’s something the reporter can barely comprehend people doing. This disappoints me as a believer in God.
According to Tunku Aziz, he had suggested to DAP secretary-general Lim Guan Eng, who is also Penang chief minister, that the party should subject him to the “same disciplinary procedure as any other party member” for his action.
An important anti-Israel Arab meme Above and beyond? Advice For Romney Hamas Poltiburo to be Selected in Next 10 Days He’s b-a-a-a-a-c-k! Guest Post: Gay and a Combat Soldier Virtual tour of Israel pavilion at South Korea’s Expo 2012 Overnight music video Debbie “Doesn’t-Do-Dishes-on-Shabbos” Wasserman Schultz’s Operation No Exodus Jordanian newspapers fall for spoof news report Be careful what you wish for Video: The Rhythm of Israel Why Israel should attack Iran Israel’s Eurovision Contestant Practice..Their Hebrew Zuckerberg: The Musical! Separated At Birth: Israeli PM Edition
one who I’ve learned a great deal about shipwreck history & process from….he surrounds himself with books of his passion: check out this book review that was just freshly pressed this week- always an interesting link to a time and place that is not our own, yet it somehow IS our own. always genius.
since they are on board. Everyone is thrown overboard. Everyone but YG. Why, you wonder? He gave these rioting guys his ROLEX!!! (Remember that for the future, please. ROLEX might safe your life someday. You better buy one now)
Well, okay: that was my first mistake. Or maybe not my first, but certainly my biggest. It wasn't a balaclava, but it sure looked like one from a distance. Turns out that what I thought was a black, menacing ski mask was actually,...
It meets our 3 criteria.
So I replaced the torn seat cover,
This is the sort of film that actors admire.
“I don’t have any details on the al-Libi case,” Powell responded.
Thursday: 30 min. run
TOTAL 9,339
I have listed the links to the ladies blogs in my side bar (this is so i don't have to go searching for them every week! Slack eh!)
Amgen Tour of California hits Santa Cruz, Monday, May 14, 2012
Not half an hour later, the phone rang again. This time it was TULL L. I answered, but I was warier now. All I said was, "Hello?"
But now we are cold. And windy. And snowy!! Looks like December, rather than March. Eegads. Get me out of here. Take me away to where there is warm air and ocean breezes!
Superstitions. When I was in college in the 70′s, I remember writing a paper for my English class on superstitions. I researched that sucker for a long time and was so pleased when I received a 100% on that paper. This morning, all I had to do was plug in “superstitions” on Google, and Viola! Sort of make me mad that Al Core didn’t invent the internet much sooner.
Below I have listed some great “gateway beers”. Hopefully these will help ease the main stream drinkers into the craft beer world. They are arranged from the easiest transitions to the more complex palate (all still make great transition beers).
LÄPPLE: Let’s remember that during the whole period of the war there had been no priestly ordinations. There was a great deal of work to do in the dioceses and parishes. One heard it said: first let’s think of pastoral work, then we’ll think about theology and scholarship. The bishops weren’t pleased when anybody asked to dedicate themselves to doing scholarly theology. But in Germany there is a law whereby if a professor is invited by a state university to teach theology, his bishop cannot veto the
There must be women who shovel when they are pregnant to no adverse effect. What did they do "back in the day"? What about single moms who have no other choice? I feel stronger, more powerful, and more in awe of my body than ever. I want to use it. The will, the spirit is there.
It was one of the first things I noticed in Poland, my head was constantly turning as gorgeous girl after gorgeous girl passed me in the street. I’m really sorry if this offends anybody, but I’m going to say it anyway, a lot of it is to do with the size of Polish women, they are simply in better shape. I also think that Polish women are less susceptible to unquestioningly surrendering to the rules of fashion that particular season
Enough said?
Article 57
Topshop is a high street brand I've never directly associated with mori girl style. But with the popularity of vintage-inspired fashion in the last few years, most mainstream shops have come up with vintage-inspired dresses that mori girls may like.
I made homemade yogurt this weekend... And after doctoring it with strawberries, it tastes pretty good. It's not as thick as store*bought yogurt - but I also didn't let it sit as long as I probably should've. Anyway. Next time, I will let it sit longer and then I'll share the recipe.
I get angry! And sometimes, I need the anger, it is a stage that I must go through so I wait for it to come because I know that if I get really super pissed off I will work through to peace quickly after.
Through the windows-through doors-burst like a ruthless force,
And then, as I was pulling back my sheets, I saw one. I actually saw one. People always talk about how small bedbugs are, and you start to think of them as more gross than scary. But when you see one that’s filled with your blood, it’s terrifying. I smothered it in a paper towel and dropped it into the toilet, flushing five times to be sure it was really gone.I hate insects, and the image of one making itself at home under my sheets is permanently seared into my brain.
Then carry, comfort, restore, and heal, give her a better start.
and then we get the prize of all dinners...
The doctor came in to look at Von's chart and she noted a mistake on his height measurement. After sending the nurse back to re-measure and then checking it herself to make sure he was barefoot, she was utterly amazed.
This woman cracks me up.
So, here was my response to her question as to why was His Love enough now?
· Conference resumes with panel sessions and keynote addresses.
Now you can see how easy it is to send data from your Arduino via an ethernet network to a web browser. But that is only to a local web browser. What if I wanted to read that data using my phone whilst trundling along on the Westlander, or from an internet cafe in downtown Vientiane? It can be done, but is a little bit tricky for the uninitiated – so let’s get initiated!
i moved her paws and saw blood.
Monday the kids had their Valentine’s day parties at school. They came home full of sugar and Valentine’s. They had lots of fun ‘playing mailman’ as Will said.
"And I didn't fucking stab her," I growled.
Yet this one family is now the focus of the nation, as well as the family of the man who pulled the trigger – Politician’s are on the floor on the Congers crying “race”! as the reason the young man was killed, has-been actresses such as Rosie O’Donnell use social media to release the address of the parents of the man who pulled the trigger. This type of act is not to help the family by any means but to incite further violence and to get another fifteen minutes of fame. The politicians of course - one can chalk that up to pandering rather than any true sense of outrage. If it were real outrage, they’d start at the beginning, and roll up their sleeves to fix the problem, rather than rant from the almighty Washington Pulpit, that continues to “define” each and every one of us as “separate” – and “separate” in any way, shape or form, translates into “not equal”.
"Nooo!" he giggled.
Our sponsor for the challenge this week is Whiff of Joy! Whiff of Joy has been super supportive of Stamp Something since our beginning and for that we are very grateful! Thank you Katharina and the WOJ team! Here is a bit of info about Whiff of Joy...
Feel free to submit any links about Newcastle to me and I will stick them up here.
We live in a technological universe in which we are always communicating. And yet we have sacrificed conversation for mere connection…
Use-value to DM's: 3 out of 5 to 5 out of 5, depending upon the type of campaign you are running. High Fantasy or pulp fantasy = 5 out of 5. Weird fantasy, post-apocalyptic, or sci-fi = 3 out of 5 at best. Oubliette is ostensibly geared toward the Labyrinth Lord ruleset, though its content would be easily adaptable to other similar systems.
and the boy was happy.
Lay down the backing first. Make sure the side you want showing is down. Then lay the batting on next. Go around and trim the edges.
Now the question, is there another book to the SBC Fighters series and is it coming out soon?!
Mdakane, who held the rank of brigadier, was dismissed on December 1 after an internal disciplinary found him guilty.
Even the six-hour drive home was enjoyable (if a little nerve-wracking) because we listened to The Hunger Games. What a great book! I can't wait to get the next one now.
Underworld Awakening starts off with a breezy flashback which puts the viewers who might have missed the other installments of the trilogy on the same page as the others who might have caught them. Selene(Kate Beckinsale) is looking to escape with her partner Michele(surprisingly missing from the cast and credit) is looking to escape from the wrath of the humans who have discovered the presence of the Vampires and Lycans and are going all out to cleanse their population of these abomination of the nature.Selene and Michele end up in a lab with a third entity known only as Subject 2. Interestingly enough Selene shares a unique bond with Subject 2 and they escape the facility with their captors hot on their trail. As Selene tries to first save and then defend Subject 2 from the humans, she realizes that what seems like a clear case of survival of the fittest might not just be as simple as it looks.
There are just too many variables… The only thing I do know is that I’d be toast.
The strange thing is that no-one saw it coming. The day before the vote, surveys had put the figure at 14%, well behind the Socialists, but this just highlighted another paradox in French society. Lots of people vote for the Front National, but nobody admits to doing so!
If there is someone in the group who has a true emergency (like a death in the family or a large medical issue), then consider asking the members of the group to donate their lessons as a service, rather than waiting for that person to recover or excluding them from the group.
5. Open the cooker; partially mash beans with back of ladle till gravy is creamy. Add garam masala powder and stir. Serve hot along with chapatti, rice etc.
Anxiety and Depression: Ask anyone with BPD if they’re anxious and depressed, they’ll answer, “Of course.”
We're changing things ever so slightly here at Truly Scrumptious. Rather than give you a sketch each time we are going to alternate sketches with themes so this time our challenge is to make a card using Brown, Pink & Green as your main colour scheme.
Tel: + 852-6517 1987
Enjoy each moment. And tell a family member and a friend how much they mean to you.
Book week is a great example of community engagement and thanks to all our teachers for making our day a fun one.
I checked my camera and shifted outside, then a few feet up to the side of the house. I crept to the same front window and peeked inside. The smell of cigars and booze preceded the picture inside. Heavy smoke filled the air. About eight men of various sizes laughed and played what looked like poker. Principal Sal, the literal definition of “the elephant in the room”, was in the midst of it all.
For more information about the memory, click here.
Meanwhile, in a large bowl add the flours, xanthan gum, salt, and spices. Mix well with a wooden spoon. Make a well by stirring the flour mix to the edges of the bowl. Add the olive oil and the yeast mixture into the center of the well. Slowly use the spoon to mix the wet ingredients with the dry until a dough forms. Then use your hands to completely combine the ingredients but don’t work it too much.
'Do not send speculative CVs but only apply for specific vacancies, CVs will not be held on file' - means we want you to look at our web site everyday and save us the bother of filing your CV in case a job suitable comes up tomorrow. That way we can save our important time as you obviously have nothing else to do.
Article 10 For works referred to in Item 2 of Article 15 of the Copyright Law, if the copyrighter is a natural person, then the copyright term will be as provided in Item 1 of Article 21 of the Copyright Law; if the copywriter is a legal person or non-legal-person organization, then the copyright term will be as provided in Item 2 of Article 21 of the Copyright Law.
They’ll let me drown the bastards, he thought. A good ridding. They’ll be herding pairs of cats, ducks and beetles onto a big boat before they thought of him.
You can see the standard palm tree icon for Arizona, along with a pool and the reflection of the palm tree and Camelback Mountain from the north side
But go ahead, Ron Paul.
Id also like to add sections weekly. Currently my weekly ideas only go as far as a “Taking Care of God’s Earth” where the whole week each day we’ll go somewhere and clean something up: trash on a street, writing on the park, etc. Another week we can focus on “Helping Others” where maybe we’ll go help a neighbor, or a friend, each day that week work on a project. A Third week we can focus on “Those Less Fortunate Than Us” where each day we can do something different like maybe going to a homeless shelter, soup kitchen, maybe just helping out with the Helping Hands or Esther’s Closet, etc.
To all communities that take action and form groups in the spirit of direct democracy, we offer support, documentation, and all of the resources at our disposal.
FIRST THINGS FIRST – WOMEN’S BODY LANGUAGE / FACIAL EXPRESSIONS – KNOW IT!
A Bunch of Old Crap that nobody wants anymore.....
And throughout the entire explanation he never again interrupted.
Power loss
fiber-like substance that your body doesn’t digest, and can be found in carb-rich foods including beans, corn, barley, brown rice, and whole grain pasta; they are also great sources of fiber. Beans are a super food: a recent 19-year-long study found that people who ate beans four times a week had a 21 percent lower risk of heart disease compared to once-a-week eaters.
But Cecil, why stop at continuations? Why not simply abolish the initial examination of patentability altogether, much like the UK Intellectual property Office has abolished relative grounds for refusal of trademark applications. Instead, let's focus our resources on the patents that really matter (say those under threat of enforcement) in a speedy inter-partes reexamination/opposition system (perhaps with the USPTO as a party representing "the public interest," similar to Section 337 investigations before the ITC) where those with greatest commercial interest in the technology will be highly motivated to conduct a complete patentability search and present the best legal arguments. Can we really afford a patent system where all (continuing) applications are treated equally?
That is what I been feeling about this whole blogging, face book, internet world. I just don't feel like it . Going on, posting, reading, and on and on.. Maybe burn out about it all.
Ah, Sigmund.
Bahr, D., & Rosenfeld-Johnson, S. (2010, February). Treatment of children with speech oral placement disorders (OPDs): A paradigm emerges. Communication Disorders Quarterly, 31, 131-138.
Seems like forever.
intrusive economic policies, high-cost welfare programs, as well as rights-negating population control measures.
2. Focus on one referee type (There are NSO's, pack referees, jammer referees, etc).
I have no idea who named this tree,
We split a subway sandwich and grabbed a bench right next to the pond.
***Summer is in the play "Annie" and casted as an Orphan. How stinkin cute can you get. Our house has been full of "It's a hard knock life", and "Little Girls" that the boys are dying when the CD gets turned on for practice. I am SO excited for her!
Ladies and Gentlemen, please put your hands together for “A Girl Named Saarah”
1 carrot, cut into 1-in chunks
I know that Zach Randolph has not played like the 2011 version of Z-Bo as of late. And I know Griffin isn’t the most important player in determining the outcome for his team, but I still see this as the most crucial matchup in what is the most evenly matched series out West. The Grizzlies have slowly been working Randolph back into the rotation, which can partly explain why he hasn’t reached 20 points in a game since March 16. But the fact of the matter is that if Memphis wants to make a deep run, they need the Randolph of old to show up. Griffin, not the most adept defender in the league, might be a good place to start. Defensively, you know that Randolph and the rest of the Grizzlies are not going to allow Griffin to simply jump over them; they will gladly send him to the line before allowing him easy buckets. If Memphis’ offense is sputtering at any point, don’t be surprised if you see them throw the ball down low to Randolph to get them going. Only if he shows up like he did last season can the Grizzlies make a deep run.
Witnesses His Resurrection!
1 c. orange bell pepper, diced
were drinking or that Paul
Our Penrith & The Border MP, Rory Stewart’s website has launched a petition to demand superfast broadband and universal mobile broadband coverage in Eden by 2012.
It’s no secret I adore graphic novels and true crime (ask the staff at the local Borders and Barnes & Noble). And it’s also no secret that upon spying another installment of Rick Geary’s A Treasury of Victorian & 20th Century Murder series I let out a little yelp of excitement and stuffed the slender tome in my book bag so quick I almost ended up wearing my Whole Foods small hot chocolate no whip. By now the local librarians are used my antics and didn’t even turn their heads. Now, the good people of West Hartford on the other hand…oh well…at least crazy girl read books right? Whatever…
I will be heading to Alabama next week to teach a workshop for the Wool Sisters---really looking forward to this as I have heard many good things about this group.
A politician can’t say anything unless a thousand people have said it.
2nd Period Symphonic Band — Wednesday, April 18th
NEW YORK, NY – After a Maricopa County law enforcement agency conducted a six-month forensic examination which determined that the image of Obama’s alleged 1961 Certificate of Live Birth posted to a government website in April, 2011 is a digital fabrication and that it did not originate from a genuine paper document, arguments from an Obama eligibility lawyer during a recent New Jersey ballot challenge hearing reveals the image was not only a fabrication, but that it was likely part of a contrived plot by counterfeiters to endow Obama with mere political support while simultaneously making the image intentionally appear absurd and, therefore, invalid as evidence toward proving Obama’s ineligibility in a court of law.
Among the many interesting things about Bogart, his paralysed upper lip may not feature highly, but it’s in there somewhere. According to various conflicting stories, Bogie suffered some kind of injury to his mouth while serving in the Navy — one version has him getting hit by shrapnel in a U-boat attack (but the dates don’t work — this was two weeks after the armistice!); the alternative has him being smashed in the face by a manacled prisoner he was transporting; the truth may well be less glamorous still – and the result was the lishp and the stiff upper lip.
Spock is given a memorable funeral send off. So good, you do not think about his family not being there, which isa point that will come up in the next film.
Raul Marroquin records Ger van Dijck reading a Magazine during lunch break at Agora Studio
I just wanted to give you an overview of what you have left to accomplish during these last six weeks. It seems like a long time but by the time you have ACC one day a week and other activities such as 8th grade tours (April 23) and Waynoka student tours (May 10), class time is pretty limited between now and the end of school. Use your time wisely while providing quality work!
Alex thinks it means Frederic is not loved by more than 100 people, at most. He doesn't really understand it completely. Seems like someone is either pissed about Frederic's writing, or his criticizing, or his not sharing of the drugs, or the not winning of his prestigious prize, or the sexiness of his film roles. Whatever the reason, the person sucks for destroying such a well-crafted piece of art.
grateful today:
Remember in the first Matrix movie when the black cat walked by our heroes, then walked by again, and Neo said, woodenly "Uh...deja vu." Trinity explained that as someone mucking about with the Matrix itself, changing something. I didn't see a black cat, but I should have, because I'm certain the Universe was tugging some strings pretty darn hard to place me there at that exact moment.
“The boy-fold really makes a difference.”
Minced pork- 450 gms
Of course, we have seen this before with the Irish vote on the Lisbon Treaty, where it appeared the government were prepared to keep forcing the public to vote until they got the answer “right”. Prior to that, the previous votes cast by both the French and the Dutch were effectively disregarded when the EU leaders merely changed the word Constitution to Lisbon Treaty and carried on regardless.
Well surprise, surprise, not the case.
Newt Gingrich to be a giant asshole and
very emotional for me
As you can see my left arm is coming along, I've had a button corsage added with purple tea splashing around it. Which will make plenty more sense when the teapot is added. My flamingos are half finished, eyes and touch ups are needed. After all the healing drama I had with Alice she smooth and no damage has been done... thank god.
Normal services have now resumed.
What are your thoughts? Is there a cartoon character that you dislike?
When Wang resorted to attempting suicide, the man brushed aside the threat, telling her to “go ahead”.
This recipe is a variation on a Delia Smith Christmas recipe and can be made with any sweet white wine, smoked or unsmoked bacon and good fresh sprouts. A white marsala wine is sweet enough to not need the honey, but I only had a dry white so I tried a small amount of honey to give a nice glaze and add that extra bit of sugar.
How much contempt can you take before you say NO. And tell these scumbags to go fuck themselves? Seriously?
This bear was so busy eating wild celery and dandelions.
With her angel wings wide
Still hears my broken song of love.
"The bags are quite big. I consider them quite stupid. Their planning was very shortsighted," Police Chief Shakaruddin Che Mood said.
I was glad he added that little bit of superstition, so dearly held by me.
I'll keep this short and sweet: it's my birthday tomorrow (yay!); I'm off to Paris for the weekend (yay!); it's sunny outside (double yay!); and I'm done with my work for the day (YAY!).
SECOND COURSE
0250 Patrol Security Officers observed two students riding pedal cycles on Beeston Lane without lights the pair were also weaving all over the roadway. Security Officers stopped the students both of whom were drunk and the cycles they were on did not belong to them. The cycles were taken from them and they were informed that they would be reported to the Head of Security.
"Oh for ****s sake! What's going on? I married you didn't I, isn't that evidence enough for you?!" she says exasperated.
PS. Happy 4th of July!
music that reminds me of lying in the grass.
I didn't believe that for a long time, but now I know it's true. After two years of riding a brutal and unpredictable emotional roller coaster, I can finally say, "I'm happy, free, and stronger than ever." HIP HIP HOORAY! Or as my sister, Laurie, would say, "Go My Life!"
How does some ice cream sound? That the more peaches you peeled, the more milk ya’d need, or do ya prefer half of it to be cream, the more bananas ya had, the more ya could stretch it, and the more freezers, the more crankin’, the more sugar, milk, bananas, ice and rock salt ya’d need.. The person who owned the cow could bring the milk. Added a child to sit on top, and had Lucky turn the crank and the more he did that, the less likely he’d end up in trouble, so makin’ ice cream was wellworthdoin’.
I write any genre that I have a good idea for. I’ve mainly been published for dark fantasy, magic realism, urban fantasy, and horror, but I also have a big soft spot for children’s literature and I’m not going to turn away from standard contemporary fiction either. If an idea or concept catches my interest enough, then I’m open to it.
‘Open target’
· The Temptations
” come on in”, he said still perplexed at this beautiful intrusion.
high as a horse's belly -
What do you do to cause your characters conflict?
*post*
While I would never want to go back to the "free-and-easy" lifestyle of my singles-days, I realized I am entering a new phase in my life. It's time to keep up with old friends and perhaps make some new ones.
This is Mark, a former colleague out boarding today – I should have asked him what tunes drive him to distraction, but I only just caught him before he was back in the water for the day’s final session.
The Barsoomians' scientific exploration of their planet and system revealed certain dire realities. Their atmosphere was thinning fairly rapidly. That was certainly inconvenient but, more significantly, water vapor being lost to space was the most serious component of their atmospheric difficulties and their planet was drying up at an alarming rate. They'd be out of water long before they had to worry about breathability-related atmospheric density problems. What to do?
Editor: “Yeah that makes sense, ‘god is good.’ You know, I also meant to ask… What language are we speaking in right now? It feels very modern.”
NEVER trust anyone. "
Those who operate more fully in the supernatural power of God understand there is power in consistency. That revelation can be tough for some people. In the natural we can become anything but consistent. Our human nature tends to be up one day and down the next. But, praise God, we don’t have to depend on our human nature to get us by because we have Jesus Christ living within us, and He’s the same yesterday, today and forever! Jesus isn’t fickle. He is for you. He doesn’t change his mind from one day to the another. He’s constant, and if you’ll press into Him, He can cause you to be that way too.
In Olympus, Jupiter was getting a little worried. Perseus was not back yet from his daily excursions and he started to regret his decision. As it started to get late. He sent out a pack of bodyguards to find Perseus and bring him back. Though the search party came back in vain. Jupiter was at his despair. Being the god of the world he had an advantage. He scanned the earth all over for him. He found traces of him near a shrub that was not far from Olympus. ”Aha!” thought Jupiter. Perseus had vanished off the face of the Earth at the entrance of the Underworld. This could only mean on thing, Perseus was in the Underworld!
Where do you start? On the face of it, Welsh Lib Dems have fallen foul of being coalition-obsessed invertebrates, the Tories have done as well as can be expected and Plaid have paid the price of being Plaid.
It does concern me though, that there are many warped perceptions in the world today concerning South Africa’s past. One of the mistaken beliefs is that the conflict in the country was dominated by rivalry between Black and White races only. Another misconception is that the indigenous Africans were the only people who suffered hardship, pain, and sorrow. This chronicle will reveal that, although there is some degree of truth in these perceptions, the current worldview is excessively unbalanced and unjust regarding this issue.
If you are unable to make either this or any of my other signings, you can order signed (sometimes even dedicated) copies of both Timeless and Soulless Vil. 1 manga (plus many of my other books) through Borderlands and they will ship to anywhere in the world within reason (plus shipping costs). Calling them is best for specific requests: 888.893.4008
Well I'm here for life
Sunday: run my first ever HALF MARATHON and then take the trek back to Nebraska.
Oh Divine redeemer from the Congo,
One positive note regarding Obama, “…no president has ever relied so extensively on the secret killing of individuals to advance the nation’s security goals.” We like secret wars such as Cambodia, Guatemala, El Salvador, and so forth, but why am I able to write about drone attacks if they’re secret. These killings should be even more secret and we shouldn’t even know there are secret killings. It shows the weakness of Obama’s foreign policy that we know about the secret killings. Strength through secrecy is my motto.
I have just read and re-read with growing joy a sentence in one of his books describing an important man who has been interrupted in his morning routine by a visit from the police.
That's where we've been.
As I mentioned, there is a very faint translucent background (which is the case with regular waterslide decals too) though once the canisters were full it was barely noticeable.
I gathered my wits to ply Mr. Desai with some pointed questions about Prohibition, a cause closest to his heart: “Do you strongly feel that Prohibition can work and work well? Going by its track record, it failed even in a developed country like the United States of America. What do you say about the evils erupting in the wake of Prohibition – illicit distillation, bootlegging, lives lost in hooch tragedies and a spurt in crime?”
Papers : Sunday Picnic and Everyday Poetry by Webster's Pages
Accordingly, what we expect that person to do or say has been defined.
Rites, initiation, differentiation and association
If you’re having a hard time making your query and first page work, go read a hundred random queries, and you’ll know EXACTLY what does and doesn’t work in a query, there’s just one caveat: you still won’t be certain about your own query. That’s the problem with things like this, we are terrible at judging our own work, and the query is just that: our work. So even though I read more than 150 (and ranked them) I’m still not sure where mine is on the scale. C’est la vie.
I hope you have enjoyed my card! I can't wait to see what you make for the challenge! Make sure you head over to the WOC Challenge Blog to see the other stunning spring creations!!!
These songs mean a great deal for me, they are a part of me;
When I searched Google for a recipe it came up with tons. I knew by experience that some exact proportion of ingredients is required to make vada tasty and crispy. When I looked into the ingredients list I found out that it has semolina, rice and all purpose flour. Semolina and rice will take care of crispiness where as the all purpose flour acts as binder and onion give tastiness. Addition of coconut and peanut gives crunchiness, spicy part is taken care by green chilies and curry and coriander leaves will enhance the flavor.
They follow the possibly extra-terrestrial footprints through the snow to the diner, only to find it occupied by a single group, traveling by bus.
San Francisco was authentic.
For the record, I don't have a particular problem with Kristen Stewart or the movies. I actually think there's a hilarious campiness quality to the final Twilight book. (Blackout sex! Vampire babies! Incisor c-sections! Man-on-newborn love! Magic powers! A climax where an American revolutionary-era vampire lectures an evil European vampire about individual liberty! Total fake out on the final battle! More blackout sex!) In essence, you need to read it as if Leslie Nielsen is playing Edward and Anna Faris is playing Bella.
What do you think? Would you wear Spanish style?
BLESSED
“59. Do you wanna be number 60?” She ripped my jacket open and forced her lips on to mine.
Sooo? Who’s ready to take a trip to Tennessee? I understand…for some of you that’s a long trip. But I do hope to meet and greet with many of my readers, fans and followers and look forward to meeting new folks and making some new friends.
Although we missed our local event at Dell Children's this past weekend (see previous post!), I heard it was a wonderful day, and they've raised nearly $90,000 so far! The Peachy Keens are thrilled to do our part in Los Angeles this summer with the 46 Mommas, and if YOU want to help us conquer kids' cancer, just click this button in the sidebar! Thanks, y'all!
Twitter: @Goggs_on_F1
This is it now! I am absolutely in love. I hung it in my foyer, so it's the first thing you see when you walk in. Oddly, no one seems to be as in love with it as I am. They just aren't as cool as me, I guess.
Upstairs are pieces by Dubliner Brendan Early. According to the press release he’s dealing with hinterlands here but there are also evocations of lonliness and isolation. The colours in the drawings and paintings are vivid and add rather than take away from the ideas of vastness. Good stuff and nicely varied. (That’s my tuppence worth anyway)
Iranian cinema fans are proud of the fact that the film has received international acclaim.
I WROTE A BOOK IN A MONTH! I’m saying it in all caps because my brain is too tired to actually feel excited, or accomplished, or much of anything. December 1st doesn’t feel as good as I thought it might. The book was more difficult toward the end, so I don’t have the same enthusiasm now that it’s over. I didn’t hit a wall until the last three days, but I did hit a wall.
But I do like semen. With the salt spray on our faces, and the ropes between our fingers we sailed across the lake, charting key positions and training a whole crew of sailors for our new navy. Considering Australia’s defence funding we should gain nautical superiority by late 2012.
scant handfuls of things luminescent,
Despite the introduction of legislation 18 months ago to ease the burden of proof for councils that want to close illegal brothels, the ABA said they continued to thrive. Alarmingly, the crisis in Australia is being repeated in other major First World countries that have legalised or decriminalised prostitution.
This is Charlie right after everyone left. He was worn out. He did great with Hudson. He was a little jealous, but by the end of the trip, he was letting Hudson pet and love on him. Charlie would cry when Hudson would cry. It was funny. He destroyed several of Hudson's toys. No surprise there. Any ball is his ball. :)
A vintage 8x10 still for WB "Bright Lights" (1935) showing stars Joe E. Brown and Ann Dvorak, Whoooopeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee!!!!!!!
Can a person, in good conscience, have silk flowers again without getting whispered about behind her back??? Please tell me your thoughts on this. I love flowers and color, but do not want to be THAT person who doesn't know when something is so out of style.
Provence is resplendent with home-wares....the côté sud kind....the grey/beige, linen, cotton look that has become a design style of the south. The natural hues work here and I think that is because the exteriors are powerful...the Provencal landscape is strong, beautiful and distinctive. Inside I seek calm away from this bold and arresting landscape.
Packing is stressful. Especially when I don’t actually have all the containers I need to be fully packed and I don’t have a car to throw things in. But it’s working. I seem to have an abnormally large number of boxes in my room, so that helped. Basically all I need now is for my dad to show up with the car and a tote or two so I can throw everything in. Of course, I can’t just leave after that, because I happen to have one of the latest finals possible. -___- Thursday at 3pm. At least that shouldn’t take very long, considering it’s just a geography unit test.
I also had some stickers made.
I like to think of an apology as an echo, a wave of sound bouncing back and forth. Or, to use another system of waves, as a ripple on water.
GOLDEN SHIELD Silent Meteor. Serial number 5TG 21565. Will Davis collection. Manufactured by Smith-Corona for Golden Shield Corporation, Great Neck, New York. The model name of this machine is very interesting; this model is what had been, prior to the introduction of the "6 series" or Galaxie machines, the Silent-Super but after introduction of the Galaxie machines had various model names in either the old Super 5 body or the new chop-front Super 5 body. The incorporation of half the old model name, plus a new name never used by Smith-Corona makes the model name all the more interesting to collectors. Of further interest is the serial number prefix, which is "5TG." Surely the G is to delineate Golden Shield, since the 5T is exactly what one would suspect to find otherwise. The five-digit number is unusual, to say the least.
In midday sun I sit
“I will make a pledge to wear the Penguin costume in full council meetings.”
From this point on Banagher meets several men that can be taken as father figures, each filling a specific role from Full Frontal as the false father, to Captain Otto Midas as the wise counselor. But the two most interesting of these relationships are with Daguza Mackle and Suberoa Zinnerman due to their adversarial nature. Daguza and Banagher spend most of their time together clashing over differing ideas of honor. However, Daguza never sees Banagher as a tool and does another thing that is extremely difficult for a father figure: admits, even if indirectly, he was wrong. This leads to their reconciliation tragically just moments before Daguza’s death at the hands of Full Frontal. Daguza’s death causes Banagher to lose control, killing Gilboa, a man he knows. This takes a good father from Tikava, a boy not much younger than himself. It’s this act that presages Banagher’s figurative and literal fall from grace as he plunges to earth and into the hands of the second of these complex men, Captain Zinnerman.
Thank you so much to everyone who joined in with our 3rd Birthday Challenge last week. It was fantastic to see so many of you coming to join the party :-)
He sent me down the road to his buddy at G&A or T&A or some such initials garage. THAT was fun, driving on that busy road a quarter of a mile to a garage, with acrid smelly smoke just wafting everywhere and me thinking I was gonna have to do a dive duck and roll outta the car at any second when it exploded in a Hollywood burst of oily flame. And me also thinking, "Dammit it's my birthday I shouldn't have to do this, am I going to die?, I might be 37 now but that is still too young to die in a horrid car fire and dammit this birthday SUCKS!"
For you to be a certain way, that “x” would have to be constant. You may do stupid things from time to time, it doesn’t show you are in fact stupid.
So far, I wasn’t jumping up and down about how great the episode was, but then they finally did some in-studio experiments with the panel. I hate it when they sit around for the whole episode, so it was nice to see them up and active this time.
12 Prayer Of Death Part Two
Light is, without a doubt, one of the most important factors in photographing anything, not just knitting. When taking photographs of knitting, you shouldn’t be inconsistent with light from photo to photo. You want to give a good idea of what the yarn and shaping look like and if the lighting is all over the place, the ‘big picture’ won’t make sense. For best results, always take your photographs outside in clear, bright but overcast weather. Sounds strange I know, but the direct sunlight will make it harder to distinguish between the colours on-screen, all of them seeming over-bright and saturated (a huge problem we encountered while photographing in the desert!). No using the cold as an excuse though! You wouldn’t believe how many times mom and I have rushed outside in below freezing weather to do a two minute photo-shoot. If we don’t get the shot, we go back out and do it again. Light really is the make or break factor.
Embrace your own doubt.
10 – 15 : You are probably missing opportunities for growing your business and controls should be improved. You have a lot of company. The majority of small businesses fall in this category. You have a high degree of fraud exposure and probably have many opportunities to reduce expenses and/or improve income.
So, there Liam was one day, in a huddle with one of his best friends, planning the day's play at recess, when I overheard one of the teachers say, "Liam, are you working on your goals?" Of course, an absolutely accurate, honest answer would have been, "Why yes, Miss Teacher, I am working on my goals right this moment! Thank you so much for your interest!" But, Liam has always been a sweet, lovely boy, not the wise guy his mom can be, and he hung his beautiful head and was thwarted once again. My heart breaks thinking of it.
a last priority.
Either way, it's a shame to see the cartwheeling fashion house go out of business. Here are some pretty shoes that are currently up for grabs that you may wish to nab before they are gone for good.
Surprisingly this type of crap also happens when we’re publically accompanied by a man. One time while out on a rather un-enjoyable dinner date, I was trying to politely find a way to get home ASAP so I could instead watch re-runs of government hearings on CSPAN or color coordinate my sock drawer. Unfortunately my attention was diverted away from my escape plans by some creepy married guy at the next table who kept staring at me. His wife cottoned on pretty quickly to his wandering eye. She then responded in the trashiest of fashion by deep kissing and dry humping her man right in the middle of the restaurant, prompting me to want to vomit all over both of their nasty asses…
The audiobook is produced by Brilliance Audio and read by Suzy Jackson. Jackson has read all the other books in this series too, so it was nice to hear a familiar voice. The production quality is excellent and this really is a gem of a series whether you are reading them or listening to them on audio.
We were over at the new acreage and discovered this tiny little guy lying in the grass right next to the concrete hanger pad. Normally, you're not supposed to bother a baby deer because his mama taught him to hold real still and will be back for him as long as you don't get your scent all over the baby. But this poor baby was obviously an orphan. You could tell he had been lying in the same spot for a long time and he was covered with ticks. Deer mommies do a great job of keeping ticks off their babies. And he was so weak he could barely lift his little head.
Other then my copyright and the frame (which you can't see that well) this shot is Straight Out of the Camera. - It's a Wasp, Up-Close and very Personal. I love this shot. The look on it's face is Priceless IMHO - This is also being entered over on Nancy's Blog (A Rural Journal) for Your Sunday Best.
So, we gather a selection of 10 different traders work and headed down to the big smoke.
Level 21: MP Cost: 50, Duration: 210 seconds, 77% chance to not get knocked back.
I hear that if you are able to identify, accept, and redirect your triggered emotions it’s like taking your life off autopilot. You’re no longer doomed to recreate that awful, I mean educational, scenario again and again. The stove is hot, the stove is hot–no more cooking. By not allowing your emotions to trigger a rote response, by choosing how you react, you shape the energy you fuel your universe with.
- ONLY transformations after payment confirmation
“I was 15-years-old when I got pregnant,” she began. She shared how she’d come from a Christian home, how she never expected that this would happen to her.
Today is “D” day. Today, with over 400.00 in parts in hand I am about to embark on fix’n it. I’ll keep you posted. Oh, and as for the slide gate on the top of the dam that required a hammer and a lever and a big guy to open, we hired a really talented welder who build us a hydraulic lift to slide the gate. He did his job and then some and I can say for sure he did more than fix it!
Halloween Crispy Bars
The concealed treasure that history temporarily forgot is a three hour drive from the colonial town of Chachapoyas.
13. North American auto Industry and The Socialist Project is a discussion with Canadian comrades setting out why nationalisation is not the answer to the problems of auto workers.
- Grandaddy - the first three albums...with an encore of the best from the rest.
In your mixer, add the crisco, then the powdered sugar, and then your marshmallows. Turn mixer on low (this is where you want to keep the head of the mixer tilted just a bit until the mixture starts to encorporate) You'll need to whack the sides of the bowl here and there to get the remaining powdered sugar off the sides. Mix on low until it's mostly encorporated and then move to medium and mix until you hear it "slap" the inside of the bowl. Take it out, making sure to get as much out of the bowl as you can, it all has bits of all the good stuff in it. Now knead, knead, knead! This is not bread, you won't over knead it, so don't worry! You want a smooth, soft ball...a little tacky because it's harder to get it sof again if it's too dry. You can always add more sifted sugar if, when you try to roll it out, it just sticks to the surface. If you do happen to get it too dry, add more Crisco, but remember with either one, too dry or too wet, add a little at a time because it doesn't take much to change the consistancy of the dough.
So the Norwegians have done all of this to me and they do not even give me the respect and opportunity to face the man who set me up as part of the trial they themselves brought me into - Nice
They do have an answer but it contradicts their whole point. They say: "That warming trend may also have shifted the winds and melted sea ice, drawing carbon dioxide out of the deep ocean, where quantities of it are stored, Shakun said"
An evening meal fit isn’t a specially complicated ensemble. The main components are the meal jumper (single breasted with ribbed silk facings on the scarf training collar), slacks (along with cotton braids in the outside appears), costume tank top (white-colored using Marcella frontage and double cuffs), bow link (dark-colored, can be bought pre-tied) and wise finished black shoes (such as brogues). Various other equipment will include a cummerbund, silk handkerchief, cuff links and also orthodontics (just make sure do not require tend to be novelty).
- Slides will NOT be accepted
Warning earplugs may be required ...
I guess there could be worse names. When I was in high school, I used to tell my friends I was going to name my first born Quincy Bozo. I was teasing, of course. But, I still remember that name. Did name a guinea pig that, though. Loved that rodent. There is a little boy in our community named Coleman Heater. I mean, seriously. There is also a boy named Hunner, because his mom didn’t know there was a “t” in there, for Hunter. Say the name a couple of times. I guess you could understand the mistake. Or not.
In course design and execution, I have experimented extensively with both modeling and teaching the values of the DIY approach and the implementation of critical-historical thinking in new technological venues. Some of these experiments have been successful, and some have not. In the column of successes I would include:
Step 6 is attaching your faux shade to the mounting piece of wood. We had a bit of extra fabric so we decided that we just wanted the shade to cover 23” of the window. So that is where we stapled the shade to the wood.
So I went into a place today that was accepting resumes. I asked if the manager was there and the person working said "No, he is gone for the day."
(And, just now, he ventured in to suggest that there are ways I can earn his consent to purchase said brand-new iPod. Pig. And yet...ah, hell, I was tired anyway.)
and why you would like them)
The Chocolate Shells required either a ganache piping in and decorating or a fruit being macerated in Kir and Stock Syrup. Both were achieved and the piping meant that I had now done it twice in a lifetime. One of the more arcane techniques which we have to learn is peeling and pitting a Grape!! So Grapes in Kir filled the remaining shells and the Salmon loomed.
This is a picture of the second Travelogue that I did pages in. The travelogue belongs to Ruthie Nava. Her travelogue was titled 'Mama Said' You can just about make out the picture on the right is of me and Mum when we were in America. My tags on the left have quotes on the reverse and the pocket is acetate.
I’m finally ready to participate in reading challenges again! It’s been a long time since I last participated and 2010 was a bad year for reading. I’m hoping that reading challenges will motivate me to pick up more books.
I'd love to be able to move somewhere warm.
He has also received a lifetime expulsion from Scottish football.
Moving along, I wound up at a house party of a bunch of college students and recent graduates, so of course all that was there was the usual supply of domestic lite lager crap. I had some Coors Light, which now tastes abysmal to me of course. Same story with Keystone lite. Had some Bud lite lime, which at least tastes like fruit loops and piss rather than just piss.
Similar bouts of perfectionism might grip some of us from time to time, forcing us to invest inordinate amounts of work for incremental improvements, and propelling us to higher levels of glory. The frustrating thing from the quants’ perspective is when the glory gets hogged by a middle-level people manager. It does happen, time and again. The quants are then left with little more than their flattering epithets.
A rare natural phenomenon turns one of Austria’s most beautiful hiking trails into a 10 meter-deep lake, for half the year.
The likelihood of collusion between elements within the British Army and British paramilitaries is so high as to be a virtual certainty. Collusion can mean many things, and operate at many levels, but the illicit supply of weapons, ammunition, equipment, and intelligence to British paramilitaries by troops on the ground is a sure thing, and something that it will be impossible for more senior officers to clamp down on even if they want to, which is by no means a certainty itself.
See how easy truth can be distorted and what happens when sheep continue to push the same fodder as those before them?! And we wonder why people give up on healing, growth, and life … its become a mockery for destruction and negative thinking instead of the lasting miracle that it is healing and life.
9. Can you hula hoop?
Personal computer printers can be recognized as impact or non-impact printing machines. Early impact printing machines processed something like an mechanistic typewriter, with a key striking an inked depression on paper for each printed type . The dot-matrix printing machine was a favourite inexpensive personal computing device printing machine. It’s an impact printer that affects the paper a course at a time. The best-known non-impact printers are the inkjet printer, an example being certain distinct models of low-cost colour printers, and the more advanced laser printers. Inkjet printers work by having the inkjet spray ink from a cartridge at an extremely close point against the paper as the roller rolls it through.
After that it took years to trust my mother again. I still don't completely trust her. She only talks to me when she wants something. She always babied my brother, but treated me like dirt. It used to hurt a lot, but I'm over it now.
“Just scatter them around my vegetable garden or something. Or in the lake. Be romantic about it if it will make you feel any better. Like I said, I’m not going to care. I’ll be dead.” She didn’t like seeing her only daughter cry and wished she would go upstairs and that this conversation had never happened.
Coming soon: my cookbook based on the recipes in this blog and a new class series, “Healthy Living in the Berkshires” which will be hosted by Bisque, Beads and Beyond on North Street starting with two information and sign up sessions May 23rd and 24th. Mark your calendars and stay tuned!
In stead of staying alive, together,
Pursuant to my last post on Ranbaxy’s new anti-malarial drug, I received a few comments indicating a certain level of confusion about the exact nature of Ranbaxy’s invention. I therefore requested Akshat Rathi, a doctoral student in chemistry at the University of Oxford, to write us a guest post tracing the evolution and nature of Ranbaxy’s invention. Akshat also writes at the Allotrope, a blog focussed on the impact of science on society.
But even that wasn't enough. I was particularly intolerant of fear in others, like my kids. I was militant about not molly-coddling that behavior--mostly because I didn't want them to live the way I did (95%) but a secondary reason was that if I "hated" fear so much, I couldn't possibly be feeling it. (5%) I covered fear with anger--lots of anger. As my friend Shay said I covered all the best parts of me with cleverness and anger--because I was also covering the parts of me of which I was ashamed.
PERFORMANCE: 9 out of 10.
Ignore that Tupperware container (that was for me, not you). So theatre and theatre-going, indeed. Let it not be said that I have failed to think about what I am watching in the past, or that I haven't given due diligence to structure and content etc. It's just that, generally speaking, if I liked it I said "That was very good" and if I didn't like it I said "that was shit". Whether those phrases were true or not for anyone else matters not, they were true for me in that moment. So, now, I am learning to be a bit more considerate and attuned in my criticism. I am learning to look at the theatre piece as an exercise in how I can be a better playwright.
People everywhere are walking on egg shells. They feel uncomfortable when sharing elevators with others. They don’t want to bug people by asking for help. Go to a bar where everyone’s drinking and you notice people aren’t quite so shy about talking to strangers anymore. That wouldn’t happen in a society where people felt it was okay to interact with human beings they don’t know. What happens when people do get too close? Let’s say I brushed you with my purse. I’d have to acknowledge this so you don’t think I’m a bitch. The expected remedy would be to toss an apology in your general direction without looking you in the eye or showing (or feeling) any real empathy. Apologies are great, but my point is that we’re let off the hook for being cold and evasive because we’re trained to act a certain way that we’ve convinced ourselves fulfills our obligations to each other. One thing seems clear: our social interactions are often awkward and repressed. As much as we try not to step on each other’s toes, we’re still not all that nice to each other.
Where Writers Write is a weekly series that will feature a different author every Wednesday as they showcase their writing spaces using short form essay, photos, and/or video. As a lover of books and all of the hard work that goes into creating them, I thought it would be fun to see where some of TNBBC's favorite authors roll up their sleeves and make the magic happen.
It would take several years before you can see the fruits of your labor. While you’re child is young, you should already consider real estate investing. Learn from the experts and try to contact a mortgage broker. Also, don’t forget to choose a real estate attorney to help you with all the legal matters. Savings is very important and you should already have one named after your child. Your child will surely be able to pursue any college degree if you prepared for his or her future at an early date.
Ever since Monday we have had mostly clear skies with occasional clouds and only one period of rain during the very early morning. And no wind to speak of.
I had gotten these Hero Arts stamps about a month ago, and had yet to use them. I added in a little bit of Lawn Fawn too for some fun touches. I'm in the process of making 2 more mini cards to complete a little set. I clear embossed the envelope pattern over the moon, and then used Distress Inks for some blending. I also black heat embossed the cat to make it shiny and add some texture. The finished size is 4x4.
In metro-New York.
But I've got to cool my heels.
* “Let's breed more high-yielding fish.”
I grew up in the Midwest, but I've lived in the Washington, DC, area for more than 30 years. I teach at George Mason University, and I work with a number of publishers reviewing content of cases and books and preparing support materials for textbooks. I'm married with two grown sons and one granddaughter.
…because our kids learn about God and get to practice it as a community without feeling shy about who they are. Today, Manarat International’s Primary Section had a Spring Presentation. There were a few different items in there. The most fun was perhaps the presentation where kids from various countries dressed up in their attire and performed cultural dances. TJ was in the “Being a Muslim” presentation. Here is a picture of the event and the poem, itself. This is the first time when TJ has worn the full Saudi attire – thobe (ankle length garment), shumagh (checkered scarf) and igal (the black rope like material that keeps the shumagh in place) although TJ has worn the burka before for his older sisters’ video.
I am SO proud to say that I think we finally got this ball rolling ! Thanks to the Mr. we have figured out how to get C.A.P to use and love the potty.
For if I should fall, the impact would shatter the pieces of my heart
Yesterday Blu-ray.com ran a story about the Blu-ray release (and, indeed, home video debut) of Louis de Rochemont’s Windjammer (1958). This is momentous news for reasons I’ll get to in a moment, but suffice to say my first reaction was, “This is going to the Blu-ray release of the year!”
This film may actually be more famous for the way it was filmed, presented in real-time, cleverly masking cuts to make it appear as one long continuous shot. Those elements helped to build up the tension right from the start, opening as it did with the last gasp of the dying man, strangled by the title character, the rope. Murder, madness and unfeeling evil sounds a lot like a horror movie to me.
This is a story about Mary.
Obviously not *that* Bl...what a pointless statement that is. Actually, yes, despite none of their members being born this early it's that same Blue scratching an AM radio MOR itch before they turned into a boy band. Happy? It turns out the pianist with the unnerving grin is the singer, and he's clearly been at the forefront of some band squabbling as he has the overhead lights all on him and the guitarist, singer of prominent backing vocals and wearer of a tie over a lime green shirt is at the far end of the stage in near complete shade for a line or two. Later on, finding himself in profile close-up, he starts miming out of the side of his mouth before reverting to attempting to sing while broadly smiling, walking a thin line between jovial and threatening. As was common the drummer is at the front despite looking like he failed the 10cc auditions and is wearing a poor Hawaiian shirt.
The water in the lake
1/4 c butter, melted
Afterwards, there'll be a svelte amount of my autobiographical narration. I have decided to integrate my non-flowery monologues, too. Yes, as if you'd fucking care.
Every pore
and we love so much
Both mani's had 1 coat of China Glaze Drawn To You from their Magnetix collection for the base color & another coat for the magnet. & Then finished off with Seche Vite. I only did the diagonal & chevron design because I had too much trouble with the star.
Gagged and blinded, confused in haze,
3. Lavished in Love
OK, I have to be honest here---this was not going to be our first time---although we hadn't lived together, we didn't miss too many nights---and of course, you cant drive home in that condition.
And check out these photos of the Hart House - the woman practices what she preaches. Her chocolate brown living room is cozy yet elegant (I'm totally jealous of anyone who can use warm browns in their decor. My husband has an aversion to such and so chocolate browns are forbidden chez moi) -
I had to have the hysterectomy when I did. I was losing too much blood. The endometriosis had wrapped all over my other organs. It would have turned cancerous quickly, and I would have died. It is easy to say you would change choices you made in life, but when you don’t have a choice to start with, you really can’t change it.
BridgePort Supris took me a bit to warm up to, but after a couple tries I can see it becoming a constant summer companion, like barbeques, sunburns, and brassmonkeys down by the river. Maybe it’s because the weather’s warm and I just got back from riding my "authentic" Peugeot 10 speed, but today its bright yellow color and sunny character seem about perfect. It makes me feel nostalgic for a summer paradise that’s a mix of all my favorite mental associations. Just imagine…
Don't worry about anything; instead, pray about everything. Tell God what you need, and thank him for all he has done. Philippians 4:6 NLT
but soon as you lay your lips on her
long laboured to destroy.
-First, let me congratulate you on winning the “Sneaker Grand Prize.”
06/06 – Pomona, CA @ The Glass House
Like a pear in frozen form with chunks of Parmigiano Reggiano.
I said, isn't the book more specifically about the fact that these young people have inherited a soulless materialistic world which makes it difficult for them to fulfil themselves?, a comment which was met with derision by those who hadn't even read the book. Pretty annoyed at having to defend the characters, and the book, against such opinionated condemnation from people who hadn't even read it, I said that I had found the characters touching, especially in their relationships: they were a platonic friendship group (of two men and one woman) who cared for each other in a touching way. Yes, said Clare, who had read the book: They snuggle up together in a hippy-dippy way - making it clear that she wasn't enamoured of the characters either, and eliciting vindicated groans from the others. I had praised the narrative voices of the characters as astute and witty - I loved for instance the description of Toronto as giving 'the efficient, ordered feeling of the Yellow Pages sprung to life in three dimensions' - but Clare said that she had found the voices slick and the characters consequently smug. I said but surely, as well as being ironic about the world around them, narrator Andy is self-ironic. It's best evidenced, I think, in this 'footnote' which however I didn't quote at the time: 'KNEE-JERK IRONY: The tendency to make flippant ironic comments as a reflexive matter of course in everyday conversation'. Clare said that she really wasn't sure that there was self-irony. She said that the characters and their attitudes reminded her very much of those in Dave Eggers' A Heartbreaking Work of Staggering Genius (discussed previously) which she had also disliked - but which I had admired. It turned out too that Doug, who had also read the book, couldn't relate at all to the characters and had found them unengaging.
This burnt sienna impasto kneads itself into crevices
A new bill, under which the Israel Bar Association will be obligated to provide legal assistance to under-privileged populations, was approved by the Knesset in late November 2009.
I did set a deadline for myself with PIERCING THROUGH THE DARKNESS. I was pushing myself into getting the novella done for the few people who actually wanted to read it before anyone else really knew I had written it. The process was pretty simple. I took my short story and translated it into an outline for a longer story. The novella is divided into six chapters. Each section except the last is divided into three sections, each in a different person’s perspective. I told myself to at least finish one section of each chapter if not more each day. Then as soon as the novella was actually written, I took a few days to edit it. I edited it at least four times and had a fellow writer friend look at it with fresh eyes for me, so I could meet my set deadline. I was a few days late, but I managed to get it done and published.
The trip to Italy during the Thanksgiving week was incredible and once again we have experienced so many great things. I couldn't resist taking pictures of so many places and stuff and I selected few clicks to share with you here.
Robert Cecil was Secretary of State as well as Leader of the House of Commons, and made earnest efforts to regulate the private lives of citizens into a neat and tidy pattern. His paternal policy was one that has often since led to disaster. He tried to enforce economy by law; it was 'most necessary' to insist on coarser bread, and thinner beer, and fewer ale-houses, and 'opening hours' for them; they must be closed at least one day a week (as in the modern 'Six Day Licence') and then, so he argued, people would grow more food. Sheep-grazing was also wrong, and must be replaced by crops of hemp and corn; though as he added, 'in these last few wet years', their deaths might as reasonably be blamed on the weather. Cecil's piety failed to convince some of the M.P.s that men should be 'compelled by penalties', as one complained, to grow the regulation amounts of wheat and hemp, etc.
2 handfuls of breadcrumbs
The title was a clever reminder that this was the sixth album and the band now had six members - Nigel had just joined. Davie Bowie was superstar guest artiste and played saxophone on To Know Him Is to Love Him. It was his first session helping out another band "and he was very shy".
This is what Eileen Myles writes:
People using digital units to make life easier. Efficiency experts send e-mails instead of letters, communicate via Facebook and shop online.
They start many orders with a complimentary batch of hot tortilla chips, covered with beans and that pungent aged cheese. Honduras is also known for tamales elote- corn tamales that are a little sweet and a little savory. Served with a thick crema it’s one of the better Central American appetizers in town. Sweet plantains are lightly fried and served simply: just a little oil and Honduran sour cream. Honduran chicken comes in several forms, including an herby and juicy fried chicken. Strangely a small dollop of ketchup is dotted on each wing. It is served with a big mound of tasty slaw and super thin-cut fried plantain chips for a good texture mix. Soups are popular with the largely Hispanic crowd. Shrimp soup can come coconut-based for a simple and rich broth almost Thai-like in flavor. Decent shrimp (probably frozen), carrots, yucca and corn on the cob provide the substance. The soup is laced with cilantro and the result is a flavorful and filling lunch. They serve those thick tortillas and sticky rice on the side.
Once again, see what God says for this Dispensation of Grace and this from Ephesians 4:32.
For over a decade, the nine riparian countries and Eritrea as an observer have been locked up in protracted negotiations to draft a new treaty on the usage of the Nile waters.
**If we never learned God’s Word, we are likely to perish or be destroyed.
The advantages of tablets are ever-increasing.
What the election cannot and will not do is provide a vision of where Greece must go.
Stay at Home Dead by Jeffrey Allen
"Think you might need glasses to read the thermometer, 10C=50F. And I'm the tampon bandit ;) "
Sliced provolone
When Harry Met Sally...
“There’s lots of really gruesome stuff going on.”
Seriously? Apparently, like Maisy, she too was a twiddler, a dreamer, a silly heart, and a jabber box.
J Street is fully on board with the Obama Administration's extreme positions, including the racist attitude of telling Jews where they may live and build simply because they're Jews. That's known as a 'complete settlement freeze' in their lingo.
When you get beyond 16 cores per chip, it becomes very difficult for the chip to function as a parallel processor without the cores being able to communicate with each other, says Lionel Kimerling, a materials science and engineering professor at MIT. “There’s going to be no way to scale performance without some sort of broadcast or near-broadcast capability,” he says.
See the Bragg Road is a straight line. It’s 8 miles long, and ya’ll are probably familiar with the line builders of some of these ancient cultures, the Celts and so on, that built these straight tracks. Some of the American Indian cultures did it as well. Supposedly these straight lines were related to their awareness of Earth energies. So we thought that Bragg Road might be some kind of inadvertent ley line, just accidentally.
It’s hard to believe that it’s been one year since my whole life changed, since I joined the awesome, exclusive club that is Down Syndrome parenting, but I woke up this morning to an alarm on my phone telling me that Sarah’s birthday is tomorrow, so I guess it’s true.
2/3 cup peanut butter
The release of Flea Market Style Mag
Goal setting again :)
Erma Bombeck is still at the top of my list. I began reading her in junior high and her works still hit the mark. Now I recognize several generations and still laugh out loud. In my late teens Truman Capote was a great fascination for me and for a lot of the world. Right now I'm reading Portraits and Observations: The Essays of Truman Capote. It will be hard to work on other things as I am captivated with the work.
And here I landlord, jubilant a while,
Me: Now that is a cool way to come up with an idea for a story!
I saved “in-progress” images as I worked through this design so later I can do an in-depth post about my drawing process! And I may write an RP post describing what Likal is doing in the picture Rith had drawn; it just screams for a story, doesn’t it? I’ll probably do this for last year’s image too. :3
Walk Number 11 - "Ashford in the Water and Monsal Dale" - 6 miles. The weather was glorious today so I just had to get out there again. I parked near Holy Trinity Church in Ashford:-
It’s a simple enough plan, the one we have. Finish working here in the wild north of China, sometime towards the end of the year. Then, go from China’s second most sensitive region (Xinjiang) to the most sensitive region (Tibet). We’re hoping to get there by a little known and little used road that has the charming distinction of being one of the highest in the world.
Anything "bad" (note the quotation marks) is the fault of unschooling. If you have trouble getting a job (regardless of the state of the economy, social privileges or a lack thereof, or any other important factors), it's because you unschooled. If you're a naturally introverted person, it's because you unschooled. If you miss a deadline, make a typo, make a small mistake when counting out change, hell, if you happen to be clumsy, it's probably because you're an unschooler.
And for the most part, the critics are right.
The ‘shill’ is the oil industry.
I also want to mention that I get my Sleek from eBay. I mean I do love Sleek, but their shipping is a bit on the expensive side. And one day I discovered the shop in the link above...
Do those sound like police state solutions? Well, that's just what the MPAA and RIAA want installed on every computer. By law. And whenever you legally purchase music or video, you are in fact contributing to powerful corporations who will lobby to make this police state nightmare into an actual reality.
It will be on display as part of a new exhibit opening at NYHS about the revolutionary period in the late 1700s marked by the American and French revolutions, and the far-too-often-forgotten Haitian Revolution. Bet you didn't know the slaves of Saint Domingue, as Haiti was once called, led the world's only successful slave rebellion and declared a republic for themselves in 1804.
1 occurs
The proximity of the point to each corner indicates the fraction of the relevant option in a given set of responses. If we assume that European peoples start their de-Islamization efforts at a point very close to the corner representing Option 1, then it is far from clear that the course taken by that point as the situation disintegrates need veer off towards Option 2 before heading for Option 3. Indeed, there is no reason in principle why de-Islamization efforts cannot move directly from Option 1 towards Option 3, skirting widely around Option 2. In this essay, I will argue that this is, in fact, what is likely to happen.
Or you can practise lording it over your minions in the comfort of your own home with Dungeon Lords. This game comes from the Czech game designer Vlaada Chvátil, who’s got a growing fanbase for his clever work. In Dungeon Lords, players each get to build up their own dungeons, with tunnels, treasure rooms, imps and monsters. Then their work is tested by marauding treasure hunters to see how well it survives attack. Players keep their dungeon supplied with food and gold, control their imps and monsters, install traps, expand with more tunnels and rooms, fight off the invaders and then get an annual inspection from the Ministry Of Dungeons. Get through two years intact and you might be crowned Dungeon Lord.
Today I want to show you a little project I put together to keep all my wrapping supplies "under wraps" (sorry I could not resist the pun).
The other tendency is to move ahead too quickly, beyond where God is. Once I run beyond the will of God…well–that just makes it harder–not for God, but for me. Yoked to Jesus, life makes sense…and, yoked to Jesus…I can’t go where He’s not.
If ASH had the slightest interest in seeking the truth, they could easily have consulted figures from the British Beer and Pub Association which show that over 4,000 pubs have closed since the ban came in.
